IBD on Facebook
IBD on Twitter
IBD on Google+
IBD on Linkedin
Streaming Quotes Are
Home
Research
News
Editorials
IBD University
IBD TV
e
IBD
LEADERBOARD
Store
MY STOCKLIST
Investors.com Privacy Policy
Last Updated May 6, 2015
Investor's Business Daily, Inc. ("IBD") and its affiliates are committed to respecting and protecting your personal privacy. Our policy includes examples of the types of information, including personal information, we may collect and the kinds of companies and/or partners with whom we may share such information. The examples below are merely illustrative and are in no way to be considered a complete inventory of the information we collect, use or share. It is our policy to comply with applicable state laws that may restrict the types of information we may disclose about you or require us to provide you with additional notices. Our Privacy Policy covering information we may collect on our Web site(s) is explained below.
What Information Does IBD Collect From You and How is it Used?
How We Gather Information From You
Registration
Products and Services Requiring Payment
Cookies
Web Beacons
Third Parties May Receive or Collect Information Through IBD
Ad Choices
Device Information
Sharing
Aggregate Information
IBD Forums
Communication via Email
Subscribing to and Unsubscribing from Email
Supplementation of Information with Affiliates
Site and Service Updates
Security
Phishing
Correcting/Updating Personal Information
Personal Information You Disclose
Children
California Privacy Rights
Website Visits from Outside the U.S.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
Legal Disclaimer
HOW WE GATHER INFORMATION FROM YOU
Our collection of information depends on the web page(s) you visit, the services you choose, and the activities in which you elect to participate such as IBD Forums and IBD social media networking sites. We may gather information in ways other than those listed here as our technology progresses.
REGISTRATION
When you register directly with us or through a third-party promotion, we may collect and store any personal information you provide. In order to use certain features and products through our Web site(s), a user must first complete a registration form. During registration, a user may be required to give their contact information (including but not limited to: name, phone number, physical address or email address) and payment information. All users must review and agree to IBD's Terms of Use. Some of our features and products have additional Terms of Use or Rules that must be reviewed and agreed to prior to completing registration.
PRODUCTS AND SERVICES REQUIRING PAYMENT
Financial information (such as a credit card number and expiration date) is used for billing purposes. If we have trouble processing an order, this information is used to get in touch with the user. This information may be shared with third parties who perform tasks required to complete the purchase transaction.
COOKIES
This site uses cookies that contain both personally identifiable information and non-personally identifiable information in order to improve and enhance the user experience. Cookies are messages placed on your computer or mobile device when you visit a website or page. For example, the messages store information so that our site immediately recognizes you each time you visit. This permits us to personalize our site for each member, allow access to the secure parts of our site that individual members have registered for and provide members with up-to-date information about their own account.
We also use cookies to deliver ads, store visitor preferences, record session information, such as items that visitors add to their shopping cart, record user-specific information on what pages users access or visit, record past activity at a site in order to provide better service when visitors return to our site, customize web page content based on visitors' browser type or other information that the visitor sends.  Additionally, cookies are used to serve ads to logged-in users based on the voluntary information they provide in their Investing Profile.
To remove or update information from your Investing Profile, please do so here (
https://myibd.investors.com/my-ibd/update-investing-profile
). To learn more about the use of cookies by third-party ad serving companies, see "
Advertisements
" section below.
If you choose to disable cookies, you may find that certain sections and functionalities of our site and/or mobile platforms will not work properly.
WEB BEACONS
Web beacons, also called web bugs and clear GIFs are used in combination with cookies to help us understand the behavior of our customers. A web beacon is typically a transparent graphic image that is placed on our site or in an email. The use of a web beacon allows IBD to record the simple actions of the user opening the page that contains the beacon.
When a user's browser requests information from a website in this way, certain simple information can also be gathered, such as: the IP address of your computer; time the material was viewed; the type of browser that retrieved the image; and the existence of cookies previously set by that server. This information is available to any web server you visit. Web beacons do not give any "extra" information away. They are simply a convenient way of gathering the simplest of statistics and managing cookies.
THIRD PARTIES MAY RECEIVE OR COLLECT INFORMATION THROUGH IBD
Credit Cards:
We use a credit card processing company to bill users for goods and services. This company will also perform a card authorization and fraud check, but this company does not retain, share, store or use personally identifiable information for any secondary purposes.
Advertisements:
IBD follows the industry's Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (OBA) located
here
. We use third-party ad serving companies, including but not limited to: DoubleClick, Inc., Omniture and Opt-Intelligence to serve certain advertisements to you when you visit this Web site.
Third-party ad serving companies and third-party vendors may use anonymous information related to your visit on this site and across multiple web sites over time to better provide advertisements to you about goods and services that may be of interest to you. Third-party ad serving companies do not have access to or use your name, address or telephone number. However, some do receive your user name/email address in order to facilitate their service. In the course of serving advertisements to this Web site, third-party ad serving companies may place or recognize a unique "cookie" through your browser. In addition, we may use Web beacons, provided by third-party advertising companies, to help manage and optimize our online advertising. Web beacons enable us to recognize a browser's cookie when a browser visits this site, and to learn which banner ads bring users to our Web site.
If you would like more information about the third-party ad serving companies used by us or regarding your ability to "opt-out" of the use of cookies, please go to
www.google.com/privacy/ads
,
http://www.google.com/intl/en/privacy/privacy-policy.html
,
www.omniture.com/en/privacy
and
http://leadserve.opt-intelligence.com/privacy.html
.
Ad Choices:
For more information about how advertisers use cookies and to understand your choice not to accept these cookies by "opting out," please visit the Network Advertising Initiative's (NAI) website at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
.  Additionally, you may "opt out" from having third party online behavioral information collected by visiting the Digital Advertising Alliance's website at
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
This privacy policy covers the use of cookies by IBD and its affiliates only and does not cover the use of cookies by any advertisers or third party partners who help us serve ads.
SHARING
IBD uses personal information obtained from its users as stated in this Privacy Policy, and to enhance users' experiences on our site. We do not share your personal information with others except as indicated in the Privacy Policy or when we inform you and give you an opportunity to opt-out of having your personal information shared.
Authorized Service Providers:
We may share your personal information with authorized service providers who perform certain services on our behalf. These service providers may have access to personal information needed to perform their functions but are not permitted to share or use such information for any other purposes
Business Partners and Affiliates:
When you make purchases, or engage in promotions offered through the website, we may share personal information with the businesses and/or affiliates with whom we partner to offer you those products, services, and/or promotions. When you elect to engage in a partner’s or affiliate’s offer or program, you authorize us to provide your email address and other information to that partner and/or affiliate.
Educational Seminars, Webinars and Live Events (“Events”):
IBD may collect and/or receive information about your registration and/or attendance at one of its Events. IBD may also collect and share your information for and Event offered in conjunction with its partners and sponsors, in which case you will be notified at the point of registration.
IBD may share, sell or rent your name and physical address. However, we will not disclose your email address, phone or fax numbers in our database without your advance permission.
DEVICE INFORMATION
IBD, its partners, and service providers may collect certain information automatically from you when you use IBD Services and apps from any electronic device. Information collected may include the type of device you use, unique device ID, geo-location, wireless mobile subscriber ISDN number, IP address, operating system, browser type, and information about your use of IBD's Services and apps. IBD may use this information as described in this Privacy Policy in order to provide you with the best experience possible across all devices you may use to access IBD Services. In order to manage the information transmitted from your device, you will need to review the device manufacturer's support materials or privacy settings for that device.
AGGREGATE INFORMATION
We may use Aggregated Information to identify things such as usage patterns and popularity of certain features on Investors.com. We may share Aggregated Information with our partners and affiliated companies.
IBD FORUMS
We offer our users the option of participating in the IBD Online Communities and Forums discussion boards. Separate registration is required prior to accessing these services. Any information you disclose when posting a message in these Online Communities and/or Forums may become public. For more information about IBD Online Communities and Forums
see
IBD Forums Rules, Policies and Disclaimers
.
COMMUNICATION VIA EMAIL
IBD will not send you marketing messages if you have opted out. IBD reserves the right to send IBD transactional messages and business relationship messages via email to facilitate agreed upon transactions or update customers about existing business relationships. Such emails include, but are not limited to, welcome emails, transaction receipts, billing notification, renewal notices, notification of activation of online privileges, technical support responses, and other communications required to service customers' accounts on Investors.com and/or customers' subscriptions with IBD or its affiliates. Customers cannot unsubscribe from these email messages.
IBD, and its affiliates, also make various email series and one-time emails available to the recipients in our database to help them get the most value from our products and services. Such emails include, but are not limited to, newsletters, product updates, educational materials, surveys, special offers from IBD and/or its affiliates as well as special offers sent on behalf of select third parties (IBD partners).
SUBSCRIBING TO AND UNSUBSCRIBING FROM EMAIL
With the exception of the mandatory IBD transactional and business relationship emails mentioned above, at the time of online registration recipients have an opportunity to confirm their email communication preferences. Customers may choose to subscribe to (opt-in) or unsubscribe (opt-out) from any or all of these email communications at will.
To Unsubscribe:
Customers may unsubscribe from specific email categories by (1) Clicking the "unsubscribe" link included at the bottom of any email sent by IBD or its affiliates (2) Sending an email to IBD Customer Service at
www.askibd.com
or (3) Calling IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
Managing Your Email Preferences:
To subscribe to or unsubscribe from any email category, customers may manage their email preferences by (1) Clicking the "My IBD" link on Investors.com and selecting Update Email Preferences or (2) By clicking on 'email preferences' link included at the bottom of emails sent by IBD and its affiliates, (3) Sending an email to IBD Customer Service at
www.askibd.com
or (4) Calling IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
Updates To Your Customer Profile:
When you contact us via email or submit an online request, we may include the contact information you provide to us (i.e. phone number or email) in your customer account profile.
SUPPLEMENTATION OF INFORMATION WITH AFFILIATES
In order to properly fulfill our obligations to our customers, it is necessary for us to supplement the information we receive with information from third-party sources. Also, in order for us to enhance our ability to tailor the site to an individual's preference, we combine information about the purchasing habits of users with similar information from our affiliates, to create a personalized user profile. When a user makes a purchase from either IBD or its affiliates, the companies collect and share that purchase information with us so we can tailor the site to our users' preferences.
SITE AND SERVICE UPDATES
We also send the user site and service announcement updates. Members are not able to un-subscribe from service announcements, which contain important information about the service. We communicate with the user to provide requested services and in regards to issues relating to their account via email or phone.
SECURITY
This Web site takes every precaution to protect our users' information. When users submit sensitive information via the Web site, that information is protected both online and off-line.
When our registration/order form asks users to enter sensitive information (such as credit card number), that information is encrypted and is protected with the encryption software - SSL. While on a secure page, such as our order form, the lock icon on the bottom of Web browsers such as Firefox® and Microsoft Internet Explorer® becomes locked, as opposed to unlocked, or open, when you are just 'surfing'. While we use SSL encryption to protect sensitive information online, we also do everything in our power to protect user-information off-line. All of our users' information, not just the sensitive information mentioned above, is restricted in our offices. Only employees who need the information to perform a specific job (for example, our billing clerk or a customer service representative) are granted access to personally identifiable information. Our employees must use passwords to access this information. Furthermore, ALL employees are required to comply with our security and privacy practices. Finally, the servers that we store personally identifiable information on are kept in a secure environment using commercially reasonable physical, technical and administrative controls to protect the information. However, please remember that no method of electronic storage or transmission over the internet is one-hundred percent secure.
If you have any questions about the security at our Web site, you can contact us at
www.askibd.com
.
PHISHING
Phishing is a term used to describe a type of Internet scam in which inauthentic emails that appear to be coming from a legitimate source are sent in an attempt to trick you into providing confidential information. These emails usually invoke a sense of urgency and often imply that your account is about to be closed unless immediate action is taken. They will often ask you to click on a link that leads you to a webpage that simulates that of the legitimate source, but is really a page specially designed to get you to input your confidential information such as account number, password, social security number or credit card number. The thieves then use that information to commit fraud and identity theft against you.
The Office of the Comptroller of Currency has set up a website providing information warning consumers about the dangers of these scams and how to protect yourself. To learn more about phishing, please click on the following link:
www.occ.gov/consumer/phishing.htm
Please know that Investor's Business Daily takes the privacy of our subscribers very seriously. If you are ever in question about the legitimacy of an email from IBD, please contact customer service at: (800) 831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600. If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you can file a complaint with the Federal Trade Commission at:
www.consumer.gov/idtheft/
. If you have any additional questions about the security of our Web site, you can contact us at
www.askibd.com
.
CORRECTING/UPDATING PERSONAL INFORMATION
Updates To Your Personal Profile:
When you contact us via email or submit an online request, we may include the contact information you provide to us (i.e. phone number or email) in your customer account profile. If your personally identifiable information changes (such as your zip code), or if you no longer desire to use our service, you may correct, update or remove your personal data provided to us. This can be done by logging in and clicking the “My IBD” link, then 'Update Profile' on the Investors.com site or you may (1) send an email to IBD Customer Service at www.askibd.com or (2) Call IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
Personal Information You Disclose
Please remember that if you choose to disclose personally identifiable information on our site, such as in IBD Forums or any of IBD's social media networking sites, it becomes public information and you should exercise caution. This means that your information may be viewed and/or collected and used by third parties without our or your knowledge. Such actions are not under our control and we are not responsible for events arising from your voluntary posting of personally identifiable information.
CHILDREN
IBD and its affiliates do not knowingly collect or solicit Personally Identifiable Information from or about children under 13. If such a situation is discovered, we will delete that information immediately. If you believe IBD has any information about or from a child under 13, please contact us at
www.askibd.com
.
California "Eraser" law (S.B. 568): If you are a California resident under 18 years of age and are a registered user of Investors.com, you have the right to request removal of content posted by you in the IBD Online Communities and Forums. To request removal, please email
ibdforumsadministrator@investors.com
or call us at 800-831-2525.
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
Pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law, California residents may opt-out of IBD’s disclosure of personal information to third-parties for their direct marketing purposes. However, opting out does not prohibit disclosures for non-marketing purposes. You may opt-out by sending an email to IBD Customer Service at www.askibd.com or (2) Calling IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
VISITING OUR WEBSITES FROM OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
This Privacy Policy is intended to cover collection of information on our websites and mobile applications from residents of the United States. If you are visiting our websites from outside the United States, please be aware that your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed in the United States where our servers are located and our central database is operated. The data protection and other laws of the United States and other countries might not be as comprehensive as those in your country. Please be assured that we seek to take commercially reasonable steps to ensure that your privacy is protected. By using our services, you understand that your information may be transferred to our facilities and those third parties with whom we share it as described in this Privacy Policy.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
These guidelines are subject to change. All changes will be posted on this page. If the changes are significant we will notify you by email and/or by posting a broadcast notice of the changes on our home page. We encourage you to review our Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed of changes that may have occurred.
Legal Disclaimer
Though we make every effort to preserve user privacy, we may need to disclose personal information. In the event of a sale, merger, public offering, bankruptcy or other change in control of IBD and/or its affiliates, your information may be shared with the person or business obtaining ownership and control. Furthermore, disclosure of personal information may be required by law where we have a good-faith belief that such action is necessary to comply with a current judicial proceeding, a court order or legal process served on our Web site. In such cases, we may raise or waive any legal objection or right available to us. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of any other web sites to which we may link.
ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS OF USE
Last updated May 6, 2015
Welcome to Investors.com presented by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. Your use of this Service (as defined below) and any materials accessed by You indicates your full understanding and acceptance of the Terms of Use (referred to as "Agreement"). This Agreement may be updated at any time without notice. Your use of Service is also subject to additional guidelines or rules posted in certain areas of the Service. Investor's Business Daily, Inc. may also provide products or services that are governed by Supplemental Terms of Use, including, but not limited to:  Investors.com stand-alone subscriptions,
e
IBD
™
, IBD
®
e
Tables, Top-Rated Stocks Under $10, Leaderboard
®
, IBD Online Communities and Forums and MarketSmith
®
. These additional guidelines, rules and Supplemental Terms of Use are incorporated into this Agreement as set forth below. Failure to comply in full will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal actions taken against the offending individuals and organizations at our discretion. We reserve the right to block your access to Service for violation of this Agreement. You agree to review the Agreement periodically to be aware of such modifications. Your continued use of the Service constitutes acceptance of the changes.
DESCRIPTION OF SERVICES
You may use the Investors.com site, digital products and services, contents, IBD mobile sites and applications, (herein referred to as "Service") operated by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. for the purpose of accessing data and information ("Data" as defined below) which are available, according to strict compliance to Terms and Conditions of Use. Active Investor's Business Daily, active IBD Monday Special, and active
e
IBD subscribers are permitted access to certain Subscriber-Only features.
DEFINITIONS
"IBD" means Investor's Business Daily, Inc. "IBD et al" means Investor's Business Daily, Inc., its affiliates, agents, information providers, and licensors.
The word "User(s)" means any Person (also referred to as "you" or "yours") visiting Investors.com or holding subscription(s) to or trial(s) of any IBD product.
The phrase "Subscriber-Only" describes any feature, function, chart, graphic or Data that is made available to Users only through a paid or trial subscription.
The word "Person(s)" means any natural person, proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other entity whatsoever.
The word "Data" means certain data and other information including the written word, instruments, charts, graphs, algorithms, ratings, rankings, products, vehicles or devices, or relating to Persons, or gathered by IBD from other sources.
The word "or" includes the word "and".
The phrase "Claims or Losses" means any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, claims, actions, suits, costs, judgments, settlements, and expenses of whatever nature, whether incurred by or issued against an indemnified party or a third party, including, without limitation, (1) indirect, special, punitive, consequential or incidental loss or damage, (including, but not limited to, trading losses, loss of anticipated profits, loss by reason of shutdown in operation or increased expenses of operation, or other indirect loss or damage) and (2) administrative costs, investigatory costs, litigation costs, and auditors' and attorneys' and fees and disbursements (including in-house personnel).
"Subscription(s)" Registering for any Service implies a Subscription.  Subscriptions are offered with the option of being billed monthly (every 30 days), quarterly (every 90 days), semi-annually (every 180 days), or annually (every 360 days).
TRADEMARK AND COPYRIGHT OWNERSHIP NOTICE
The following trademarks and their corresponding logos are owned by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. and registered in the United States and other countries: Investor's Business Daily, IBD,
e
IBD, CAN SLIM, Leaderboard, Stock Checkup, Stocks On The Move, AskIBD, SmartSelect.
The following trademarks are affiliated with William O'Neil + Company, Incorporated or its subsidiaries: The William O'Neil + Co. 197 Industry Groups and O'Neil Database.
The following trademarks are owned by MarketSmith, Incorporated and registered in the United States and other countries: MarketSmith.
All trademarks used herein are the exclusive property of their respective trademark owners and may not be used in any way without written consent of owner.
Investors.com contains proprietary, original content that is protected by U.S. copyright and international treaties. IBD retains all intellectual property rights. IBD will pursue legal action against anyone who misappropriates its name, trademarks or content. This notice constitutes fair warning. Copyright Investor's Business Daily, Inc. PO Box 92089 Los Angeles, CA 90009. All rights reserved.
USE LIMITATIONS
Some IBD features are limited to the following views and/or retrievals per 24-hour period for each User:
IBD Stock Checkup feature is limited to 300 views and/or retrievals;
IBD Charts feature is limited to 1500 views/and/or retrievals; and
IBD Quotes feature is limited to 1500 views and/or retrievals.
You may not participate in coordinated efforts or group activities with others in order to exceed these use limitations.  Failure to comply with these limitations will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal action against the offending individuals and/or organizations at the discretion of IBD.
FREE TRIALS, SPECIAL AND INTRODUCTORY OFFERS
Free Trial Orders:
If You sign up for a Free Trial to a Service, Your trial subscription will automatically convert into a continuous paid subscription at the end of the Free Trial period unless a cancellation request is received prior to the end of the specified Free Trial period. For details refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy. At the discretion of IBD, we may make special offers, promotions or send invitations to participate in a trial that does not automatically convert into a paid subscription and does not require cancellation before the end of said trial. Such offers will include language to this effect.
FREE TRIAL RESTRICTIONS:
(1) Print and Print-Digital Combo products - You and/or Your household are limited to a TOTAL of two (2) Free Trials during a one (1) year period and no more than one (1) Free Trial may be taken during a consecutive six(6) month period. (2) Digital products on Investors.com - You and/or Your household are limited to a TOTAL of two (2) Free Trials during a one (1) year period and no more than one (1) Free Trial may be taken during a consecutive three (3) month period.  IBD reserves the right to immediately terminate Your Free Trial and access to its Services, at any time, if it determines (at its sole discretion) there has been abuse of this Free Trial Restriction policy.  Delivery restrictions may apply.  All Free Trial Offers are subject to change without prior notification.
Special and Introductory Offers ("Offers"):
If You sign up for an Offer to an IBD Service, Your Subscription will automatically convert into a continuous paid subscription at the end of the Offer period unless a cancellation request is received prior to the end of the specified Offer period. For details refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy. At the discretion of IBD, we may make special or introductory offers, promotions or send invitations to participate in a trial that does not automatically convert into a paid subscription and does not require cancellation before the end of said trial. Such offers will include language to this effect.
RESTRICTIONS:
You must be a New customer. Offers are available to United States residents only and delivery restrictions may apply. You and/or Your household are limited to one Offer in a twelve (12) month period. IBD reserves the right to immediately terminate Your Offer and access to its Services, at any time, if it determines (at its sole discretion) there has been abuse of these restrictions. All Offers are subject to change without prior notification.
REFUND POLICY
We reserve the right to alter this policy at any time, at our discretion, without prior notification. A pro-rata refund of the unused portion of a current subscription may be granted at our discretion. You are obligated to pay the entire monthly fee for the month of cancellation regardless of when the termination was initiated during the month. Any subsequent refunds from a cancellation will be pro-rated based on a calendar monthly billing cycle regardless of the billing cycle selected during the initial registration, and any billing changes made during Your subscription period for a Service. After receiving a cancellation notice, IBD will promptly process any refund due. Please note: NO CASH/CHECK REFUND MAY BE MADE ON BANK CARD PURCHASES.
AUTO-RENEW AND CANCELLATION POLICY
Subscriptions purchased are auto-renewed at the end of the subscription term. You will not receive renewal reminders prior to being charged for such renewals. Renewal prices are subject to change without notice. In the event that IBD is unable to process Your credit card payment (when applicable), We reserve the right to terminate Your access without prior notice. You may cancel Your subscription at any time and IBD may terminate, or change a Service at any time. Cancellations received for Free Trial subscriptions before the end of the specified trial period will prevent a conversion to billing at the specified monthly or annual rate. All terminations shall be effective immediately upon receipt of notice. Should You object to any terms and conditions of this Agreement or any subsequent modifications or become dissatisfied with a Service in any way, You agree that Your sole recourse is to immediately (1) discontinue use of the Service(s); (2) terminate Your membership; and (3) notify IBD's Customer Service Department of Your termination. To cancel your subscription, you must notify IBD by phone at (800) 831-2525 in the United States, (800) 664-2013 in Canada and at (310) 448-6600 in other Countries.
PROPRIETARY DATA AND INFORMATION
You acknowledge that Service contains Data that is highly proprietary in nature and that unauthorized copying, transfer or use may cause IBD or its affiliates, agents, information providers, and licensors irreparable injury that cannot be adequately compensated for by means of monetary damages. You agree that any breach of the Agreement may be enforced by IBD by means of equitable relief (including, but not limited to, injunctive relief) in addition to any other available rights and remedies.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The information provided by Investor's Business Daily is not and should not be construed as a solicitation to buy or sell any securities. It has been obtained from sources we believe to be reliable; however, no guarantee is made or implied with respect to its accuracy or completeness. The information and content provided by Investor's Business Daily are subject to change without notice and Investor's Business Daily, Inc., its parent company, sister companies, subsidiaries, employees, officers, agents, or representatives may from time to time have long or short positions or may acquire direct or indirect beneficial interest in securities mentioned or those not so mentioned.
DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES, TERMS AND LIABILITY
THE DATA AND INFORMATION ACCESSIBLE ON THIS SERVICE ARE PROVIDED "AS IS" AND THERE MAY BE DELAYS, OMISSIONS OR INACCURACIES IN SUCH INFORMATION AND DATA. IBD ET AL CANNOT AND DOES NOT GUARANTEE THE ACCURACY, SEQUENCE, COMPLETENESS, TIMELINESS, MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OF THE INFORMATION OR DATA MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SERVICE OR BY ANY FORCE MAJEURE OR ANY OTHER CAUSE BEYOND THEIR REASONABLE CONTROL. IBD ET AL SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY LOSS OR INJURY CAUSED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY ITS NEGLIGENCE, OMISSION IN PROCURING, COMPILING, INTERPRETING, EDITING, WRITING, REPORTING, TRANSMITTING OR DELIVERING ANY INFORMATION OR DATA THROUGH THIS SERVICE OR FOR INTERRUPTION IN ANY SUCH DATA. IN NO EVENT WILL IBD BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY DECISION MADE OR ACTION TAKEN BY YOU IN RELIANCE UPON SUCH INFORMATION OR DATA OR FOR ANY CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL OR SIMILAR DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOST PROFITS, TRADING LOSSES, DAMAGES RESULTING FROM INCONVENIENCE, OR LOSS OF USE OF THE SERVICE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. THIS SERVICE MAY BE DISCONTINUED OR LIMITED AT ANY TIME.
INDEMNIFICATION
Indemnification:
You agree to indemnify and hold IBD, its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, officers and employees and third-party information providers harmless from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, obligations, costs and expenses (including attorney's fees) resulting or arising from any claim, action or proceeding brought by any third party in connection with or relating to your access to or use of the Service (or the use of the Service by another person using your password) in breach of this Agreement.
USER NAME / PASSWORD PROTECTION
You agree to take all reasonable steps to protect the Service from unauthorized access or use. Upon registering, you will choose a user name and password that will permit you to access the Service. You agree that you will be the sole User of the Service under this Agreement. Your Username/Password are subject to cancellation or suspension by IBD, including upon your misuse of the Username/password in any way. You agree that you will use your best efforts to prevent any third party from obtaining the Username/password, and you will inform IBD immediately of any actual or potential unauthorized access to a Username/password or to the Service.
ACCESS / INTERFERENCE / MODIFICATION / LINKS / FRAMES
You may not frame or utilize framing techniques that involve any trademark, logo, copyrighted material or other proprietary information (including images, text, page layout, or form) of any portion of Investors.com without our express written consent. In addition, you agree not to decompile, reverse engineer or disassemble any software or other products or processes accessible through Investors.com, not to use any device, software or routine to interfere or attempt to interfere with the proper working of Service, not to take any action that imposes an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the IBD infrastructure, and not to use any data mining, robot, spider, crawler, cancelbots, Trojan horse, or any data gathering or extraction method or manual process to facilitate the misuse of Investors.com.
DISSEMINATION DISCONTINUANCE OR MODIFICATION
You understand that, at any time, IBD may discontinue disseminating any category of Data, may change or eliminate any transmission method and may change transmission speeds or other signal characteristics. You shall not hold IBD et al liable for any resulting liability, loss or damages that may arise therefrom. You acknowledge that IBD, in its sole discretion, may from time to time make modifications to its system, the Service, or Data.
COPYRIGHT PROTECTION - REDISSEMINATION PROHIBITED
All of the information, content, services and software displayed on, transmitted through, or used in connection with Investors.com, including for example IBD Stock Checkup, IBD Charts, guides, news articles, opinions, reviews, text, photographs, images, illustrations, html, source and object code, software, data, etc. (collectively, the "Content"), as well as its trade dress, layout, presentation, selection and arrangement, is owned by IBD, and its affiliated companies, licensors and suppliers. IBD actively protects its rights to the Content to the fullest extent of the law. You may not use such material except as provided in this Agreement.
You may use the Content online and solely for your personal, non-commercial use, and you may download or print a single copy of any portion of the Content for your personal, non-commercial use, provided you do not remove any trademark, copyright or other notice contained in such Content. No other use is permitted. You may not, for example, republish the Content on any Internet, Intranet or Extranet site or incorporate the Content in any database, compilation, archive or cache. You may not distribute any of the Content to others, whether or not for payment or other consideration, and you may not modify, copy, frame, reproduce, sell, publish, transmit, display or otherwise use any portion of the Content without the written consent of IBD. For information on requests to use of the Content for any purpose other than as permitted in this paragraph, please see
Licensing
.
"Dow Jones®" and "Dow Jones IndexesSM" are service marks of Dow Jones Trademark Holdings, LLC ("Dow Jones"), have been licensed to CME Group Index Holdings LLC ("CME") and have been sublicensed for use for certain purposes by IBD. IBD's products based on the "Dow Jones IndexesSM" are not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Down Jones, CME or their respective affiliates and Dow Jones, CME and their respective affiliates make no representation regarding the advisability of investing in such product(s).
The "NYSE Short Interest Data" is proprietary to and distributed by The New York Stock Exchange under license agreement.
The "S&P 500" data is the property of Chicago Mercantile Exchange, Inc. and its licensors. All rights reserved.
Any use of "Dow Jones", "Dow Jones Indexes", "NYSE Short Interest Data" and "S&P" 500 data is solely for your personal, non-commercial use pursuant to IBD's Terms and Conditions of Use. Any redistribution of the data is strictly prohibited.
Exchange data provided by BATS Global Markets, Inc. is provided under license agreement.  By using the Investors.com site and Service, You are agreeing to be bound by the BATS Subscriber Agreement and that:
a.    You have read and agree to be bound by the BATS Global Markets Inc. Subscriber Agreement found at
http://cdn.batstrading.com/resources/membership/Subscriber_Agreement.pdf
b.    IBD as a Data Recipient/Vendor (i) is not an agent of BATS Global Markets, Inc.; (ii) is not authorized to add to or delete any terms of provision from the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement; and (iii) is not authorized to modify any provision of the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement; and
c.    no provision has been added to or deleted from the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement and that no modifications have been made to it.  You warrant that You are legally able to undertake the obligations set forth in the Subscriber Agreement and agree to be bound by the terms of the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement.
The William O'Neil + Co. database and all data contained herein are provided by
William O'Neil + Co. Incorporated
and are used by IBD under license agreement. Daily Graphs and Daily Graphs Online are trademarks of William O'Neil + Co. Incorporated or its subsidiaries.  © 2015 William O'Neil + Co. Incorporated.  All Rights Reserved.
Charts provided by
MarketSmith, Inc.
are used by IBD under license agreement. MarketSmith is a registered trademark of MarketSmith, Incorporated.  © 2015 MarketSmith, Incorporated. All Rights Reserved.
INTERACTIVE DATA REAL-TIME SERVICES, INC.
All information (the “Interactive Data Information”) provided by Interactive Data Real-Time Services, Inc. (together with its affiliates collectively referred to as “Interactive Data”) is owned by or licensed to Interactive Data and any user is permitted to use such Interactive Data Information only for such user’s personal use. In no event shall any user publish, retransmit, redistribute or otherwise reproduce any Interactive Data Information in any format to anyone, and no user shall use any Interactive Data Information in or in connection with any business or commercial enterprise, including, without limitation, any securities, investment, accounting, banking, legal or media business or enterprise.
Prior to relying on any Interactive Data Information and/or the execution of a security trade based upon such Interactive Data Information, you are advised to consult with your broker or other financial representative to verify pricing information.
THE INTERACTIVE DATA INFORMATION IS PROVIDED TO THE USERS “AS IS.” NEITHER INTERACTIVE DATA, NOR ITS AFFILIATES, NOR ANY THIRD PARTY DATA PROVIDER MAKE ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND REGARDING THE INTERACTIVE DATA INFORMATION, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OR USE. NEITHER INTERACTIVE DATA, NOR ITS AFFILIATES, NOR ANY THIRD PARTY DATA PROVIDER WILL BE LIABLE TO ANY USER OR ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY INTERRUPTION, INACCURACY, ERROR OR OMISSION, REGARDLESS OF CAUSE, IN THE INTERACTIVE DATA INFORMATION OR FOR ANY DAMAGES (WHETHER DIRECT OR INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR EXEMPLARY) RESULTING THEREFROM.
DURATION/SURVIVAL
This Agreement remains in effect for so long as you have the ability to receive Data as contemplated by this Agreement. Paragraphs INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY NOTICES, PROPRIETARY DATA AND INFORMATION and DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES, TERMS AND LIABILITY survive termination of this Agreement. If any of the provisions of this Agreement, or application thereof to any Person or circumstance, shall to any extent be held invalid or unenforceable, the remainder of this Agreement, or the application of such terms or provisions to Persons or circumstances other than those as to which they are held invalid or unenforceable, shall not be affected thereby and each such term and provision of this Agreement shall be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.
Natural persons executing this Agreement warrant and represent that they are at least eighteen (18) years of age. Users and the Person executing this Agreement on behalf of any User that is a proprietorship, corporation, partnership or other entity, represent that such Person is duly authorized by all necessary and appropriate corporate or other action to execute the Agreement on behalf of User. This Agreement shall be deemed to have been made in the United States in Los Angeles, California and shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the validity and performance shall be governed by, the laws of California, without reference to principles of conflicts of laws thereof. User hereby consents to submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of or for Los Angeles, California in connection with any action or proceeding instituted relating to this Agreement.
Under the penalties for perjury, you understand that by using the Service, You certify that You have read and understand the above and agree to the terms and conditions.
In addition, your use of any of these services: Investors.com,
e
IBD, IBD
e
Tables, Leaderboard, Top-Rated Stocks Under $10, CAN SLIM Masters Program, MarketSmith, The William O'Neil + Co. 197 Industry Groups PDF or IBD Online Communities and Forums and any materials accessed therein indicates your full understanding and acceptance of the Terms of Use for that service, and indicates your full understanding and acceptance of our Investors.com Terms & Conditions Of Use. See below to review the corresponding Agreements and Supplemental Terms of Use for these services.
SUPPLEMENTAL TERMS OF USE AND SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENTS
TERMS OF USE AND SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT FOR Investors.com, eIBD™, IBD® eTables, Leaderboard®, and Top-Rated Stocks Under $10
These Supplemental Terms, in conjunction with the Investors.com Terms of Use Agreement, govern your use of each of the following Services as operated by Investor's Business Daily, Inc: Investors.com, eIBD, IBD eTables, Leaderboard, and Top-Rated Stocks Under $10. You agree to review the Agreement periodically to be aware of any changes. Your continued use constitutes acceptance of the changes.
ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS
Use of Investors.com, eIBD, IBD eTables, Leaderboard, or Top-Rated Stocks Under $10 and any materials accessed herein provides sufficient evidence of full acceptance by You of both the
Investors.com Terms of Use Agreement
and these Supplemental Terms of Use. Failure to comply in full will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal action taken against the offending individual(s) and organization(s) at the discretion of IBD. We reserve the right to block access to a service for anyone who violates our Terms of Use Agreements.
SUBSCRIPTION AND SECURITY
When You subscribe, You will fill out our registration form that requires various information about You. You are responsible for providing accurate subscription registration information and of updating it as required. IBD reserves the right to change or revoke Your User name, as it deems necessary. You are also responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of Your password. IBD may store the information provided by You in the registration process, and provide aggregate statistical information about Users to potential advertisers and other publications. IBD may use the information provided by You to inform You about other publications, products and services. For more details, see our Privacy Policy.
Subscriptions:  Registering for any Service implies a Subscription.  Subscriptions are offered with the option of being billed monthly (every 30 days), quarterly (every 90 days), semi-annually (every 180 days), or annually (every 360 days).
TERMS AND TERMINATION
Registering for a Service may imply an ongoing subscription based on Your selected Service, billing frequency and term. Your registration may constitute advanced consent to receive and pay for the subscription in the future on a continuing basis, without further consent, until You or IBD cancel the subscription. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Online Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services through our online process, Your subscription will automatically renew and continue until terminated by IBD or until You notify IBD of Your cancellation. You may cancel Your subscription at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Mail Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services by mailing in an order coupon to IBD, Your subscription will lapse at the end of the subscription term and will not automatically renew unless You have affirmatively checked the box indicating auto-renew on the order coupon. In the event You checked the auto-renew option, Your subscription will continue until terminated by IBD or until You notify IBD of Your cancellation. You may cancel Your subscription at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Inbound Call Center Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services as a result of Your placing a telephone call to IBD, Your subscription will automatically renew and continue until terminated by IBD or until You notify IBD of Your cancellation. You may cancel Your subscription at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Outbound Sales Call Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services as a result of an outbound telephone sales call, Your subscription will lapse at the end of the subscription term. It will not automatically renew. To continue your subscription, please call Investor's Business Daily at (800) 831-2525. During the subscription term, You may cancel at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Free Trial Orders:
SEE SECTION ON
FREE TRIALS, SPECIAL AND INTRODUCTORY OFFERS
ABOVE
CHANGES TO A SERVICE OR THE AGREEMENT
IBD may, at any time, change or discontinue any aspect or feature of a Service, including content, hours of availability, and equipment and software needed for access or use. You agree to be bound by future revisions of this Agreement. It is Your responsibility to visit the "Terms of Use" link at the bottom of Investors.com homepage periodically to review the most current terms and conditions. IBD may also impose limits on certain features and services or restrict Your access to parts or all a Service without notice or liability.
REFUND POLICY
We reserve the right to alter this policy at any time, at our discretion, without prior notification. A pro-rata refund of the unused portion of a current subscription may be granted at our discretion. You are obligated to pay the entire monthly fee for the month of cancellation regardless of when the termination was initiated during the month. Any subsequent refunds from a cancellation will be pro-rated based on a calendar monthly billing cycle regardless of the billing cycle selected during the initial registration, and any billing changes made during Your subscription period for a Service. After receiving a cancellation notice, IBD will promptly process any refund due. Please note: NO CASH/CHECK REFUND MAY BE MADE ON BANK CARD PURCHASES.
AUTO-RENEW AND CANCELLATION POLICY
Subscriptions purchased are auto-renewed at the end of the subscription term. You will not receive renewal reminders prior to being charged for such renewals. Renewal prices are subject to change without notice. In the event that IBD is unable to process Your credit card payment (when applicable), We reserve the right to terminate Your access without prior notice. You may cancel Your subscription at any time and IBD may terminate, or change a Service at any time. Cancellations received for Free Trial subscriptions before the end of the specified trial period will prevent a conversion to billing at the specified monthly or annual rate. All terminations shall be effective immediately upon receipt of notice. Should You object to any terms and conditions of this Agreement or any subsequent modifications or become dissatisfied with a Service in any way, You agree that Your sole recourse is to immediately (1) discontinue use of the Service(s); (2) terminate Your membership; and (3) notify IBD's Customer Service Department of Your termination. To cancel your subscription, contact IBD by phone at (800) 831-2525 in the United States, (800) 664-2013 in Canada, and at (310) 448-6600 in other Countries.
TERMINATION DUE TO BREACH
Without limiting the foregoing, IBD has the right to immediately terminate Your account in the event that You breach this Agreement. If Your account is terminated, You are and will remain responsible for all charges incurred up to the time of termination.
IBD ONLINE COMMUNITIES AND FORUMS; Rules, Policies, and Disclaimers
SUMMARY
IBD Online Communities and Forums are designed to facilitate the free exchange of ideas regarding specific investment related topics. For discussion purposes only, you may post copyrighted material owned by yourself, or owned by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. or MarketSmith® on the Investors.com Online Community and Forums pages, if you are a paid subscriber to Investor's Business Daily, eIBD™, Investors.com, or MarketSmith®. Due to the real-time nature of the IBD Online Communities and Forums, it is impossible for us to review all messages or confirm the validity of all information posted. Please note that we may or may not actively monitor the contents of posted messages and are not responsible for the content of any messages posted. In no instance does IBD or its affiliated companies endorse content or claims contained in the posted messages. The messages in the IBD Online Communities and Forums express the views of the author of the message, not necessarily the views of IBD or any entity affiliated with IBD. IBD does not make investment recommendations. Information posted by subscribers on IBD Online Communities and Forums should not be used as a substitute for independent research, and should not be relied on to trade or make investment decisions. Occasionally, a staff member may participate in the IBD Online Communities and Forums. In such case, we will clearly identify the participant as an IBD staff member.
CONTENT POSTED BY YOU
By submitting a username and password on any IBD Online Community and/or Forum registration page, you agree to be bound by the Investors.com Terms of Use as well as the Supplemental Terms set forth herein (collectively "Terms of Use").
IBD does not claim ownership of any content submitted by you. However, by posting content to public areas of Investors.com, you grant us, our parent, affiliates, and distributors a worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, non-exclusive and fully transferable and sublicensable right to use, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create derivative works from, distribute, and display comments you post, in whole or in part, throughout the world.
REMOVAL OF POSTS/MESSAGES
Any user who feels that a posted message is objectionable is encouraged to contact us immediately by e-mail at
ibdforumsadministrator@investors.com
. We have the ability to remove objectionable or violative messages. If it is determined that removal is necessary, we will make every effort to do so within a reasonable time frame. This is a manual process, however, so we may not be able to remove particular messages immediately.
California "Eraser" law (S.B. 568): If you are a California resident under 18 years of age and are a registered user of Investors.com, you have the right to request removal of content you posted in the IBD Online Communities and Forums. To request removal, please email
ibdforumsadministrator@investors.com
or call us at 800-831-2525.
RESTRICTED ACTIVITIES
You agree, through your use of this service, that your activities on the site shall not:
• be false, inaccurate or misleading;
• infringe on any third party's copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret or other proprietary rights or rights of publicity or privacy;
• violate any law, statute, ordinance or regulation;
• be defamatory, vulgar, hateful, obscene, profane, libelous, unlawfully threatening or unlawfully harassing;
• contain advertisements, chain letters, pyramid schemes, commercial messages, auctions, or solicitations;
• contain any viruses, impose an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the investors.com infrastructure, and not use any data mining, robot, spider, worms, time bombs, crawler, cancelbots, Trojan horse, or any data gathering or extraction method or manual process that may damage, detrimentally interfere with or intercept any system, data or personal information; and
• create liability for use or cause us to lose the services of our ISPs or other suppliers.
Violations of IBD Forums' policies will result in the termination of your account.
DISCLAIMER
IBD Online Communities and Forums, and related companies are not responsible for the accuracy, errors, or omissions of any information posted on the IBD Online Communities and Forums, including hyperlinks appearing in the IBD Online Communities and Forums, and are not responsible for any trading or investment decisions based on such information. The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission recognizes the growing possibility of Cyberfraud. Please refer to
www.sec.gov/investor/pubs/cyberfraud.htm
for further information, or to the SEC's main website at www.sec.gov or the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. at nasd.com.
Although the IBD does not and cannot review all the messages posted and is not responsible for the content of any of these messages, IBD reserves the right to delete any message for any or no reason whatsoever, including but not limited to excessive use of copyrighted material or excessive self promotion. IBD reserves the right to determine what constitutes "excessive" related to message removal. We do not guarantee or warrant the accuracy, completeness or usefulness of any message, and are not responsible for the contents of any message. You remain solely responsible for the content of your messages, and you agree to indemnify and hold harmless IBD and all affiliates with respect to any claim based upon transmission of your message(s). Any personal information you post in the IBD Online Communities and Forums becomes public information. You should exercise caution when deciding to disclose any personal information. IBD and related companies are not responsible for any events or damages arising from your disclosure of personal information in the IBD Online Communities and Forums.
PRIVACY
The IBD and affiliated companies take user privacy very seriously and will take reasonable measures to respect your privacy. However, under special circumstances, such as to comply with court orders or other legal obligations, IBD may provide personally identifiable information to third parties that may include IP addresses. Otherwise IBD will only use your information in accordance with our
Privacy
Statement. IBD does not knowingly allow access to or collect information from children under the age of 13. If you are not over the age of 13, click cancel below and do not register. Refer to
https://www.ftc.gov/enforcement/rules/rulemaking-regulatory-reform-proceedings/childrens-online-privacy-protection-rule
for further information.
The Subscription Terms available via the link below govern Your access and use of MarketSmith.
MarketSmith®
SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT FOR USE OF
MARKETSMITH® ONLINE INVESTMENT RESEARCH TOOL
Copyright 2021 Investor's Business Daily, LLC
Registration Benefits
Sign In
Information
1
2
3
4
IBD Forums
Participate in an IBD Forum and connect with other IBD subscribers.
IBD Screen Center
Access six valuable screens that show you top stocks in different categories.
My Stock Lists
Get customized stock lists to track your portfolio, watch lists and more!
My Routine
Create shortcuts to your favorite Investors.com features.
Register
Sign In
Sign In
Information
Register »
Can't access your account? »
NEED TO REGISTER?:
I
am
a current subscriber and need to register on
Investors.com.
I
am not
a current subscriber and want to register
for free membership on Investors.com.
BACK TO TOP
About Investor's Business Daily
Founded by William J. O’Neil, Investor’s Business Daily provides exclusive stock lists, market data and research, helping investors take advantage of the The IBD Methodology to make more money in the stock market.
FOLLOW US:
IBD on Facebook
IBD on Twitter
IBD on Google+
IBD on Linkedin
Getting Started
About Us
Reviews
Site Map
Your Ad Choices
Advertising
Markets & Research
IBD Stock Charts
Stock Checkup
Stock Quotes
Stock Market Today
The Big Picture
My Stock Lists
Premium Tools
IBD Live
Leaderboard
SwingTrader
MarketSurge
IBD Digital
MarketDiem
Dow Jones Network
The Wall Street Journal
Barron’s
MarketWatch
Dow Jones Smart Money
Dow Jones Network
|
The Wall Street Journal
|
Barron’s
|
MarketWatch
|
Dow Jones Smart Money
Privacy Notice
|
Terms of Use
|
Accessibility
Information in Investor’s Business Daily is for informational and educational purposes only and should not be construed as an offer, recommendation, solicitation, or rating to buy or sell securities. The information has been obtained from sources we believe to be reliable, but we make no guarantee as to its accuracy, timeliness, or suitability, including with respect to information that appears in closed captioning. Historical investment performances are no indication or guarantee of future success or performance. Authors/presenters may own the stocks they discuss. We make no representations or warranties regarding the advisability of investing in any particular securities or utilizing any specific investment strategies. Information is subject to change without notice. For information on use of our services, please see our
Terms of Use
. *Real-time prices by Nasdaq Last Sale. Real-time quote and/or trade prices are not sourced from all markets. Ownership data provided by LSEG and Estimate data provided by FactSet.
IBD, IBD Digital, IBD Live, IBD Weekly, Investor's Business Daily, Leaderboard, MarketDiem, MarketSurge and other marks are trademarks owned by Investor's Business Daily, LLC.
© 2025 Investor's Business Daily, LLC. All rights reserved.
Stock Research
IBD Charts
Stocks on the Move
Screen Center
IBD Stock Checkup
More Premium Products
e
Tables
Stocks Under $10
MarketSurge
Investing Research
ETF Center
IBD's ETF Market Strategy
IBD's 197 Industry Groups
IBD Industry Sector Finder
Top Story
Dow Jones Futures Jump 400 Points On Trump Tariff News; Nvidia, Tesla Rally
08:40 AM ET - The Dow Jones Industrial Average and other major stock futures rallied Monday on reports that President Donald Trump may exclude ...
Register to read article »
Latest News
IBM Called Best Idea Amid Enterprise 'Demand Shift' For AI Applications
Bitcoin Price Rises After Tariff Comments; ETF Inflows Rebound
Dow Jones Futures Jump 400 Points On Trump Tariff News; Nvidia, Tesla Rally
BYD Earnings Top Views With Tesla Rival Charging Up Tech
Dow Jones Futures Jump On Trump Tariff 'Flexibility'; Now Look For This Signal
The Cream Of The Crop: 5 Biotechs That Outrank Most Stocks
How To Invest: Short Interest Can Be Your Secret Weapon For Identifying Stock Rallies
Quick Links
Stock Market Today
The Big Picture
Investing
Business
Economy
Technology
Management
Politics
Retirement
Special Reports
Latest Commentary
Trump Tariffs: EU Hits Back As Steel, Aluminum Tariffs Kick In; S&P 500 Bounces
Trump Executive Orders: S&P 500 Braces For Tariffs, Deportations On Inauguration Day
How Elon Musk, Donald Trump And DOGE Will Take On The Federal Government, And What It Means For The S&P 500
Donald Trump Threatens Big Tariff Hikes On China, Canada, Mexico On Day One
GOP Wins Battle For House Control, Putting Full Trump Agenda In Play
Donald Trump Taps Elon Musk, Vivek Ramaswamy To Run Government Efficiency Effort
Quick Links
IBD/TIPP Poll
Columnists
IBD University
Investing lessons created by IBD experts to help you master the CAN SLIM Investing system, tips for buying and selling stocks, while giving you a routine for using IBD. Our lessons are designed for all investing levels to help you succeed.
Learn how to invest using IBD
IBD University Topics
Getting Started with IBD
The CAN SLIM Investing System
How to Time the Stock Market
How to Find and Evaluate Stocks
How to Read Stock Charts
How to Buy Stocks
When to Sell Stocks
Time Saving Routine Using IBD
Quick Links
Live Investing Workshops
Homestudy Courses
Investor's Corner
Educational & Strategy Videos
ASK IBD
IBD Key Terms
IBD Meetup
Quick Links
Market Wrap
IBD Stock Analysis
IBD Investing Show
IBD 2-Minute Tips
Education
Market Timing SeriesIBD on Facebook
IBD on Twitter
IBD on Google+
IBD on Linkedin
Streaming Quotes Are
Home
Research
News
Editorials
IBD University
IBD TV
e
IBD
LEADERBOARD
Store
MY STOCKLIST
Investors.com Privacy Policy
Last Updated May 6, 2015
Investor's Business Daily, Inc. ("IBD") and its affiliates are committed to respecting and protecting your personal privacy. Our policy includes examples of the types of information, including personal information, we may collect and the kinds of companies and/or partners with whom we may share such information. The examples below are merely illustrative and are in no way to be considered a complete inventory of the information we collect, use or share. It is our policy to comply with applicable state laws that may restrict the types of information we may disclose about you or require us to provide you with additional notices. Our Privacy Policy covering information we may collect on our Web site(s) is explained below.
What Information Does IBD Collect From You and How is it Used?
How We Gather Information From You
Registration
Products and Services Requiring Payment
Cookies
Web Beacons
Third Parties May Receive or Collect Information Through IBD
Ad Choices
Device Information
Sharing
Aggregate Information
IBD Forums
Communication via Email
Subscribing to and Unsubscribing from Email
Supplementation of Information with Affiliates
Site and Service Updates
Security
Phishing
Correcting/Updating Personal Information
Personal Information You Disclose
Children
California Privacy Rights
Website Visits from Outside the U.S.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
Legal Disclaimer
HOW WE GATHER INFORMATION FROM YOU
Our collection of information depends on the web page(s) you visit, the services you choose, and the activities in which you elect to participate such as IBD Forums and IBD social media networking sites. We may gather information in ways other than those listed here as our technology progresses.
REGISTRATION
When you register directly with us or through a third-party promotion, we may collect and store any personal information you provide. In order to use certain features and products through our Web site(s), a user must first complete a registration form. During registration, a user may be required to give their contact information (including but not limited to: name, phone number, physical address or email address) and payment information. All users must review and agree to IBD's Terms of Use. Some of our features and products have additional Terms of Use or Rules that must be reviewed and agreed to prior to completing registration.
PRODUCTS AND SERVICES REQUIRING PAYMENT
Financial information (such as a credit card number and expiration date) is used for billing purposes. If we have trouble processing an order, this information is used to get in touch with the user. This information may be shared with third parties who perform tasks required to complete the purchase transaction.
COOKIES
This site uses cookies that contain both personally identifiable information and non-personally identifiable information in order to improve and enhance the user experience. Cookies are messages placed on your computer or mobile device when you visit a website or page. For example, the messages store information so that our site immediately recognizes you each time you visit. This permits us to personalize our site for each member, allow access to the secure parts of our site that individual members have registered for and provide members with up-to-date information about their own account.
We also use cookies to deliver ads, store visitor preferences, record session information, such as items that visitors add to their shopping cart, record user-specific information on what pages users access or visit, record past activity at a site in order to provide better service when visitors return to our site, customize web page content based on visitors' browser type or other information that the visitor sends.  Additionally, cookies are used to serve ads to logged-in users based on the voluntary information they provide in their Investing Profile.
To remove or update information from your Investing Profile, please do so here (
https://myibd.investors.com/my-ibd/update-investing-profile
). To learn more about the use of cookies by third-party ad serving companies, see "
Advertisements
" section below.
If you choose to disable cookies, you may find that certain sections and functionalities of our site and/or mobile platforms will not work properly.
WEB BEACONS
Web beacons, also called web bugs and clear GIFs are used in combination with cookies to help us understand the behavior of our customers. A web beacon is typically a transparent graphic image that is placed on our site or in an email. The use of a web beacon allows IBD to record the simple actions of the user opening the page that contains the beacon.
When a user's browser requests information from a website in this way, certain simple information can also be gathered, such as: the IP address of your computer; time the material was viewed; the type of browser that retrieved the image; and the existence of cookies previously set by that server. This information is available to any web server you visit. Web beacons do not give any "extra" information away. They are simply a convenient way of gathering the simplest of statistics and managing cookies.
THIRD PARTIES MAY RECEIVE OR COLLECT INFORMATION THROUGH IBD
Credit Cards:
We use a credit card processing company to bill users for goods and services. This company will also perform a card authorization and fraud check, but this company does not retain, share, store or use personally identifiable information for any secondary purposes.
Advertisements:
IBD follows the industry's Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (OBA) located
here
. We use third-party ad serving companies, including but not limited to: DoubleClick, Inc., Omniture and Opt-Intelligence to serve certain advertisements to you when you visit this Web site.
Third-party ad serving companies and third-party vendors may use anonymous information related to your visit on this site and across multiple web sites over time to better provide advertisements to you about goods and services that may be of interest to you. Third-party ad serving companies do not have access to or use your name, address or telephone number. However, some do receive your user name/email address in order to facilitate their service. In the course of serving advertisements to this Web site, third-party ad serving companies may place or recognize a unique "cookie" through your browser. In addition, we may use Web beacons, provided by third-party advertising companies, to help manage and optimize our online advertising. Web beacons enable us to recognize a browser's cookie when a browser visits this site, and to learn which banner ads bring users to our Web site.
If you would like more information about the third-party ad serving companies used by us or regarding your ability to "opt-out" of the use of cookies, please go to
www.google.com/privacy/ads
,
http://www.google.com/intl/en/privacy/privacy-policy.html
,
www.omniture.com/en/privacy
and
http://leadserve.opt-intelligence.com/privacy.html
.
Ad Choices:
For more information about how advertisers use cookies and to understand your choice not to accept these cookies by "opting out," please visit the Network Advertising Initiative's (NAI) website at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
.  Additionally, you may "opt out" from having third party online behavioral information collected by visiting the Digital Advertising Alliance's website at
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
This privacy policy covers the use of cookies by IBD and its affiliates only and does not cover the use of cookies by any advertisers or third party partners who help us serve ads.
SHARING
IBD uses personal information obtained from its users as stated in this Privacy Policy, and to enhance users' experiences on our site. We do not share your personal information with others except as indicated in the Privacy Policy or when we inform you and give you an opportunity to opt-out of having your personal information shared.
Authorized Service Providers:
We may share your personal information with authorized service providers who perform certain services on our behalf. These service providers may have access to personal information needed to perform their functions but are not permitted to share or use such information for any other purposes
Business Partners and Affiliates:
When you make purchases, or engage in promotions offered through the website, we may share personal information with the businesses and/or affiliates with whom we partner to offer you those products, services, and/or promotions. When you elect to engage in a partner’s or affiliate’s offer or program, you authorize us to provide your email address and other information to that partner and/or affiliate.
Educational Seminars, Webinars and Live Events (“Events”):
IBD may collect and/or receive information about your registration and/or attendance at one of its Events. IBD may also collect and share your information for and Event offered in conjunction with its partners and sponsors, in which case you will be notified at the point of registration.
IBD may share, sell or rent your name and physical address. However, we will not disclose your email address, phone or fax numbers in our database without your advance permission.
DEVICE INFORMATION
IBD, its partners, and service providers may collect certain information automatically from you when you use IBD Services and apps from any electronic device. Information collected may include the type of device you use, unique device ID, geo-location, wireless mobile subscriber ISDN number, IP address, operating system, browser type, and information about your use of IBD's Services and apps. IBD may use this information as described in this Privacy Policy in order to provide you with the best experience possible across all devices you may use to access IBD Services. In order to manage the information transmitted from your device, you will need to review the device manufacturer's support materials or privacy settings for that device.
AGGREGATE INFORMATION
We may use Aggregated Information to identify things such as usage patterns and popularity of certain features on Investors.com. We may share Aggregated Information with our partners and affiliated companies.
IBD FORUMS
We offer our users the option of participating in the IBD Online Communities and Forums discussion boards. Separate registration is required prior to accessing these services. Any information you disclose when posting a message in these Online Communities and/or Forums may become public. For more information about IBD Online Communities and Forums
see
IBD Forums Rules, Policies and Disclaimers
.
COMMUNICATION VIA EMAIL
IBD will not send you marketing messages if you have opted out. IBD reserves the right to send IBD transactional messages and business relationship messages via email to facilitate agreed upon transactions or update customers about existing business relationships. Such emails include, but are not limited to, welcome emails, transaction receipts, billing notification, renewal notices, notification of activation of online privileges, technical support responses, and other communications required to service customers' accounts on Investors.com and/or customers' subscriptions with IBD or its affiliates. Customers cannot unsubscribe from these email messages.
IBD, and its affiliates, also make various email series and one-time emails available to the recipients in our database to help them get the most value from our products and services. Such emails include, but are not limited to, newsletters, product updates, educational materials, surveys, special offers from IBD and/or its affiliates as well as special offers sent on behalf of select third parties (IBD partners).
SUBSCRIBING TO AND UNSUBSCRIBING FROM EMAIL
With the exception of the mandatory IBD transactional and business relationship emails mentioned above, at the time of online registration recipients have an opportunity to confirm their email communication preferences. Customers may choose to subscribe to (opt-in) or unsubscribe (opt-out) from any or all of these email communications at will.
To Unsubscribe:
Customers may unsubscribe from specific email categories by (1) Clicking the "unsubscribe" link included at the bottom of any email sent by IBD or its affiliates (2) Sending an email to IBD Customer Service at
www.askibd.com
or (3) Calling IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
Managing Your Email Preferences:
To subscribe to or unsubscribe from any email category, customers may manage their email preferences by (1) Clicking the "My IBD" link on Investors.com and selecting Update Email Preferences or (2) By clicking on 'email preferences' link included at the bottom of emails sent by IBD and its affiliates, (3) Sending an email to IBD Customer Service at
www.askibd.com
or (4) Calling IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
Updates To Your Customer Profile:
When you contact us via email or submit an online request, we may include the contact information you provide to us (i.e. phone number or email) in your customer account profile.
SUPPLEMENTATION OF INFORMATION WITH AFFILIATES
In order to properly fulfill our obligations to our customers, it is necessary for us to supplement the information we receive with information from third-party sources. Also, in order for us to enhance our ability to tailor the site to an individual's preference, we combine information about the purchasing habits of users with similar information from our affiliates, to create a personalized user profile. When a user makes a purchase from either IBD or its affiliates, the companies collect and share that purchase information with us so we can tailor the site to our users' preferences.
SITE AND SERVICE UPDATES
We also send the user site and service announcement updates. Members are not able to un-subscribe from service announcements, which contain important information about the service. We communicate with the user to provide requested services and in regards to issues relating to their account via email or phone.
SECURITY
This Web site takes every precaution to protect our users' information. When users submit sensitive information via the Web site, that information is protected both online and off-line.
When our registration/order form asks users to enter sensitive information (such as credit card number), that information is encrypted and is protected with the encryption software - SSL. While on a secure page, such as our order form, the lock icon on the bottom of Web browsers such as Firefox® and Microsoft Internet Explorer® becomes locked, as opposed to unlocked, or open, when you are just 'surfing'. While we use SSL encryption to protect sensitive information online, we also do everything in our power to protect user-information off-line. All of our users' information, not just the sensitive information mentioned above, is restricted in our offices. Only employees who need the information to perform a specific job (for example, our billing clerk or a customer service representative) are granted access to personally identifiable information. Our employees must use passwords to access this information. Furthermore, ALL employees are required to comply with our security and privacy practices. Finally, the servers that we store personally identifiable information on are kept in a secure environment using commercially reasonable physical, technical and administrative controls to protect the information. However, please remember that no method of electronic storage or transmission over the internet is one-hundred percent secure.
If you have any questions about the security at our Web site, you can contact us at
www.askibd.com
.
PHISHING
Phishing is a term used to describe a type of Internet scam in which inauthentic emails that appear to be coming from a legitimate source are sent in an attempt to trick you into providing confidential information. These emails usually invoke a sense of urgency and often imply that your account is about to be closed unless immediate action is taken. They will often ask you to click on a link that leads you to a webpage that simulates that of the legitimate source, but is really a page specially designed to get you to input your confidential information such as account number, password, social security number or credit card number. The thieves then use that information to commit fraud and identity theft against you.
The Office of the Comptroller of Currency has set up a website providing information warning consumers about the dangers of these scams and how to protect yourself. To learn more about phishing, please click on the following link:
www.occ.gov/consumer/phishing.htm
Please know that Investor's Business Daily takes the privacy of our subscribers very seriously. If you are ever in question about the legitimacy of an email from IBD, please contact customer service at: (800) 831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600. If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you can file a complaint with the Federal Trade Commission at:
www.consumer.gov/idtheft/
. If you have any additional questions about the security of our Web site, you can contact us at
www.askibd.com
.
CORRECTING/UPDATING PERSONAL INFORMATION
Updates To Your Personal Profile:
When you contact us via email or submit an online request, we may include the contact information you provide to us (i.e. phone number or email) in your customer account profile. If your personally identifiable information changes (such as your zip code), or if you no longer desire to use our service, you may correct, update or remove your personal data provided to us. This can be done by logging in and clicking the “My IBD” link, then 'Update Profile' on the Investors.com site or you may (1) send an email to IBD Customer Service at www.askibd.com or (2) Call IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
Personal Information You Disclose
Please remember that if you choose to disclose personally identifiable information on our site, such as in IBD Forums or any of IBD's social media networking sites, it becomes public information and you should exercise caution. This means that your information may be viewed and/or collected and used by third parties without our or your knowledge. Such actions are not under our control and we are not responsible for events arising from your voluntary posting of personally identifiable information.
CHILDREN
IBD and its affiliates do not knowingly collect or solicit Personally Identifiable Information from or about children under 13. If such a situation is discovered, we will delete that information immediately. If you believe IBD has any information about or from a child under 13, please contact us at
www.askibd.com
.
California "Eraser" law (S.B. 568): If you are a California resident under 18 years of age and are a registered user of Investors.com, you have the right to request removal of content posted by you in the IBD Online Communities and Forums. To request removal, please email
ibdforumsadministrator@investors.com
or call us at 800-831-2525.
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
Pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law, California residents may opt-out of IBD’s disclosure of personal information to third-parties for their direct marketing purposes. However, opting out does not prohibit disclosures for non-marketing purposes. You may opt-out by sending an email to IBD Customer Service at www.askibd.com or (2) Calling IBD Customer Service at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States 1-310-448-6600.
VISITING OUR WEBSITES FROM OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
This Privacy Policy is intended to cover collection of information on our websites and mobile applications from residents of the United States. If you are visiting our websites from outside the United States, please be aware that your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed in the United States where our servers are located and our central database is operated. The data protection and other laws of the United States and other countries might not be as comprehensive as those in your country. Please be assured that we seek to take commercially reasonable steps to ensure that your privacy is protected. By using our services, you understand that your information may be transferred to our facilities and those third parties with whom we share it as described in this Privacy Policy.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
These guidelines are subject to change. All changes will be posted on this page. If the changes are significant we will notify you by email and/or by posting a broadcast notice of the changes on our home page. We encourage you to review our Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed of changes that may have occurred.
Legal Disclaimer
Though we make every effort to preserve user privacy, we may need to disclose personal information. In the event of a sale, merger, public offering, bankruptcy or other change in control of IBD and/or its affiliates, your information may be shared with the person or business obtaining ownership and control. Furthermore, disclosure of personal information may be required by law where we have a good-faith belief that such action is necessary to comply with a current judicial proceeding, a court order or legal process served on our Web site. In such cases, we may raise or waive any legal objection or right available to us. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of any other web sites to which we may link.
ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS OF USE
Last updated May 6, 2015
Welcome to Investors.com presented by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. Your use of this Service (as defined below) and any materials accessed by You indicates your full understanding and acceptance of the Terms of Use (referred to as "Agreement"). This Agreement may be updated at any time without notice. Your use of Service is also subject to additional guidelines or rules posted in certain areas of the Service. Investor's Business Daily, Inc. may also provide products or services that are governed by Supplemental Terms of Use, including, but not limited to:  Investors.com stand-alone subscriptions,
e
IBD
™
, IBD
®
e
Tables, Top-Rated Stocks Under $10, Leaderboard
®
, IBD Online Communities and Forums and MarketSmith
®
. These additional guidelines, rules and Supplemental Terms of Use are incorporated into this Agreement as set forth below. Failure to comply in full will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal actions taken against the offending individuals and organizations at our discretion. We reserve the right to block your access to Service for violation of this Agreement. You agree to review the Agreement periodically to be aware of such modifications. Your continued use of the Service constitutes acceptance of the changes.
DESCRIPTION OF SERVICES
You may use the Investors.com site, digital products and services, contents, IBD mobile sites and applications, (herein referred to as "Service") operated by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. for the purpose of accessing data and information ("Data" as defined below) which are available, according to strict compliance to Terms and Conditions of Use. Active Investor's Business Daily, active IBD Monday Special, and active
e
IBD subscribers are permitted access to certain Subscriber-Only features.
DEFINITIONS
"IBD" means Investor's Business Daily, Inc. "IBD et al" means Investor's Business Daily, Inc., its affiliates, agents, information providers, and licensors.
The word "User(s)" means any Person (also referred to as "you" or "yours") visiting Investors.com or holding subscription(s) to or trial(s) of any IBD product.
The phrase "Subscriber-Only" describes any feature, function, chart, graphic or Data that is made available to Users only through a paid or trial subscription.
The word "Person(s)" means any natural person, proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other entity whatsoever.
The word "Data" means certain data and other information including the written word, instruments, charts, graphs, algorithms, ratings, rankings, products, vehicles or devices, or relating to Persons, or gathered by IBD from other sources.
The word "or" includes the word "and".
The phrase "Claims or Losses" means any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, claims, actions, suits, costs, judgments, settlements, and expenses of whatever nature, whether incurred by or issued against an indemnified party or a third party, including, without limitation, (1) indirect, special, punitive, consequential or incidental loss or damage, (including, but not limited to, trading losses, loss of anticipated profits, loss by reason of shutdown in operation or increased expenses of operation, or other indirect loss or damage) and (2) administrative costs, investigatory costs, litigation costs, and auditors' and attorneys' and fees and disbursements (including in-house personnel).
"Subscription(s)" Registering for any Service implies a Subscription.  Subscriptions are offered with the option of being billed monthly (every 30 days), quarterly (every 90 days), semi-annually (every 180 days), or annually (every 360 days).
TRADEMARK AND COPYRIGHT OWNERSHIP NOTICE
The following trademarks and their corresponding logos are owned by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. and registered in the United States and other countries: Investor's Business Daily, IBD,
e
IBD, CAN SLIM, Leaderboard, Stock Checkup, Stocks On The Move, AskIBD, SmartSelect.
The following trademarks are affiliated with William O'Neil + Company, Incorporated or its subsidiaries: The William O'Neil + Co. 197 Industry Groups and O'Neil Database.
The following trademarks are owned by MarketSmith, Incorporated and registered in the United States and other countries: MarketSmith.
All trademarks used herein are the exclusive property of their respective trademark owners and may not be used in any way without written consent of owner.
Investors.com contains proprietary, original content that is protected by U.S. copyright and international treaties. IBD retains all intellectual property rights. IBD will pursue legal action against anyone who misappropriates its name, trademarks or content. This notice constitutes fair warning. Copyright Investor's Business Daily, Inc. PO Box 92089 Los Angeles, CA 90009. All rights reserved.
USE LIMITATIONS
Some IBD features are limited to the following views and/or retrievals per 24-hour period for each User:
IBD Stock Checkup feature is limited to 300 views and/or retrievals;
IBD Charts feature is limited to 1500 views/and/or retrievals; and
IBD Quotes feature is limited to 1500 views and/or retrievals.
You may not participate in coordinated efforts or group activities with others in order to exceed these use limitations.  Failure to comply with these limitations will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal action against the offending individuals and/or organizations at the discretion of IBD.
FREE TRIALS, SPECIAL AND INTRODUCTORY OFFERS
Free Trial Orders:
If You sign up for a Free Trial to a Service, Your trial subscription will automatically convert into a continuous paid subscription at the end of the Free Trial period unless a cancellation request is received prior to the end of the specified Free Trial period. For details refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy. At the discretion of IBD, we may make special offers, promotions or send invitations to participate in a trial that does not automatically convert into a paid subscription and does not require cancellation before the end of said trial. Such offers will include language to this effect.
FREE TRIAL RESTRICTIONS:
(1) Print and Print-Digital Combo products - You and/or Your household are limited to a TOTAL of two (2) Free Trials during a one (1) year period and no more than one (1) Free Trial may be taken during a consecutive six(6) month period. (2) Digital products on Investors.com - You and/or Your household are limited to a TOTAL of two (2) Free Trials during a one (1) year period and no more than one (1) Free Trial may be taken during a consecutive three (3) month period.  IBD reserves the right to immediately terminate Your Free Trial and access to its Services, at any time, if it determines (at its sole discretion) there has been abuse of this Free Trial Restriction policy.  Delivery restrictions may apply.  All Free Trial Offers are subject to change without prior notification.
Special and Introductory Offers ("Offers"):
If You sign up for an Offer to an IBD Service, Your Subscription will automatically convert into a continuous paid subscription at the end of the Offer period unless a cancellation request is received prior to the end of the specified Offer period. For details refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy. At the discretion of IBD, we may make special or introductory offers, promotions or send invitations to participate in a trial that does not automatically convert into a paid subscription and does not require cancellation before the end of said trial. Such offers will include language to this effect.
RESTRICTIONS:
You must be a New customer. Offers are available to United States residents only and delivery restrictions may apply. You and/or Your household are limited to one Offer in a twelve (12) month period. IBD reserves the right to immediately terminate Your Offer and access to its Services, at any time, if it determines (at its sole discretion) there has been abuse of these restrictions. All Offers are subject to change without prior notification.
REFUND POLICY
We reserve the right to alter this policy at any time, at our discretion, without prior notification. A pro-rata refund of the unused portion of a current subscription may be granted at our discretion. You are obligated to pay the entire monthly fee for the month of cancellation regardless of when the termination was initiated during the month. Any subsequent refunds from a cancellation will be pro-rated based on a calendar monthly billing cycle regardless of the billing cycle selected during the initial registration, and any billing changes made during Your subscription period for a Service. After receiving a cancellation notice, IBD will promptly process any refund due. Please note: NO CASH/CHECK REFUND MAY BE MADE ON BANK CARD PURCHASES.
AUTO-RENEW AND CANCELLATION POLICY
Subscriptions purchased are auto-renewed at the end of the subscription term. You will not receive renewal reminders prior to being charged for such renewals. Renewal prices are subject to change without notice. In the event that IBD is unable to process Your credit card payment (when applicable), We reserve the right to terminate Your access without prior notice. You may cancel Your subscription at any time and IBD may terminate, or change a Service at any time. Cancellations received for Free Trial subscriptions before the end of the specified trial period will prevent a conversion to billing at the specified monthly or annual rate. All terminations shall be effective immediately upon receipt of notice. Should You object to any terms and conditions of this Agreement or any subsequent modifications or become dissatisfied with a Service in any way, You agree that Your sole recourse is to immediately (1) discontinue use of the Service(s); (2) terminate Your membership; and (3) notify IBD's Customer Service Department of Your termination. To cancel your subscription, you must notify IBD by phone at (800) 831-2525 in the United States, (800) 664-2013 in Canada and at (310) 448-6600 in other Countries.
PROPRIETARY DATA AND INFORMATION
You acknowledge that Service contains Data that is highly proprietary in nature and that unauthorized copying, transfer or use may cause IBD or its affiliates, agents, information providers, and licensors irreparable injury that cannot be adequately compensated for by means of monetary damages. You agree that any breach of the Agreement may be enforced by IBD by means of equitable relief (including, but not limited to, injunctive relief) in addition to any other available rights and remedies.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The information provided by Investor's Business Daily is not and should not be construed as a solicitation to buy or sell any securities. It has been obtained from sources we believe to be reliable; however, no guarantee is made or implied with respect to its accuracy or completeness. The information and content provided by Investor's Business Daily are subject to change without notice and Investor's Business Daily, Inc., its parent company, sister companies, subsidiaries, employees, officers, agents, or representatives may from time to time have long or short positions or may acquire direct or indirect beneficial interest in securities mentioned or those not so mentioned.
DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES, TERMS AND LIABILITY
THE DATA AND INFORMATION ACCESSIBLE ON THIS SERVICE ARE PROVIDED "AS IS" AND THERE MAY BE DELAYS, OMISSIONS OR INACCURACIES IN SUCH INFORMATION AND DATA. IBD ET AL CANNOT AND DOES NOT GUARANTEE THE ACCURACY, SEQUENCE, COMPLETENESS, TIMELINESS, MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OF THE INFORMATION OR DATA MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SERVICE OR BY ANY FORCE MAJEURE OR ANY OTHER CAUSE BEYOND THEIR REASONABLE CONTROL. IBD ET AL SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY LOSS OR INJURY CAUSED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY ITS NEGLIGENCE, OMISSION IN PROCURING, COMPILING, INTERPRETING, EDITING, WRITING, REPORTING, TRANSMITTING OR DELIVERING ANY INFORMATION OR DATA THROUGH THIS SERVICE OR FOR INTERRUPTION IN ANY SUCH DATA. IN NO EVENT WILL IBD BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY DECISION MADE OR ACTION TAKEN BY YOU IN RELIANCE UPON SUCH INFORMATION OR DATA OR FOR ANY CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL OR SIMILAR DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOST PROFITS, TRADING LOSSES, DAMAGES RESULTING FROM INCONVENIENCE, OR LOSS OF USE OF THE SERVICE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. THIS SERVICE MAY BE DISCONTINUED OR LIMITED AT ANY TIME.
INDEMNIFICATION
Indemnification:
You agree to indemnify and hold IBD, its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, officers and employees and third-party information providers harmless from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, obligations, costs and expenses (including attorney's fees) resulting or arising from any claim, action or proceeding brought by any third party in connection with or relating to your access to or use of the Service (or the use of the Service by another person using your password) in breach of this Agreement.
USER NAME / PASSWORD PROTECTION
You agree to take all reasonable steps to protect the Service from unauthorized access or use. Upon registering, you will choose a user name and password that will permit you to access the Service. You agree that you will be the sole User of the Service under this Agreement. Your Username/Password are subject to cancellation or suspension by IBD, including upon your misuse of the Username/password in any way. You agree that you will use your best efforts to prevent any third party from obtaining the Username/password, and you will inform IBD immediately of any actual or potential unauthorized access to a Username/password or to the Service.
ACCESS / INTERFERENCE / MODIFICATION / LINKS / FRAMES
You may not frame or utilize framing techniques that involve any trademark, logo, copyrighted material or other proprietary information (including images, text, page layout, or form) of any portion of Investors.com without our express written consent. In addition, you agree not to decompile, reverse engineer or disassemble any software or other products or processes accessible through Investors.com, not to use any device, software or routine to interfere or attempt to interfere with the proper working of Service, not to take any action that imposes an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the IBD infrastructure, and not to use any data mining, robot, spider, crawler, cancelbots, Trojan horse, or any data gathering or extraction method or manual process to facilitate the misuse of Investors.com.
DISSEMINATION DISCONTINUANCE OR MODIFICATION
You understand that, at any time, IBD may discontinue disseminating any category of Data, may change or eliminate any transmission method and may change transmission speeds or other signal characteristics. You shall not hold IBD et al liable for any resulting liability, loss or damages that may arise therefrom. You acknowledge that IBD, in its sole discretion, may from time to time make modifications to its system, the Service, or Data.
COPYRIGHT PROTECTION - REDISSEMINATION PROHIBITED
All of the information, content, services and software displayed on, transmitted through, or used in connection with Investors.com, including for example IBD Stock Checkup, IBD Charts, guides, news articles, opinions, reviews, text, photographs, images, illustrations, html, source and object code, software, data, etc. (collectively, the "Content"), as well as its trade dress, layout, presentation, selection and arrangement, is owned by IBD, and its affiliated companies, licensors and suppliers. IBD actively protects its rights to the Content to the fullest extent of the law. You may not use such material except as provided in this Agreement.
You may use the Content online and solely for your personal, non-commercial use, and you may download or print a single copy of any portion of the Content for your personal, non-commercial use, provided you do not remove any trademark, copyright or other notice contained in such Content. No other use is permitted. You may not, for example, republish the Content on any Internet, Intranet or Extranet site or incorporate the Content in any database, compilation, archive or cache. You may not distribute any of the Content to others, whether or not for payment or other consideration, and you may not modify, copy, frame, reproduce, sell, publish, transmit, display or otherwise use any portion of the Content without the written consent of IBD. For information on requests to use of the Content for any purpose other than as permitted in this paragraph, please see
Licensing
.
"Dow Jones®" and "Dow Jones IndexesSM" are service marks of Dow Jones Trademark Holdings, LLC ("Dow Jones"), have been licensed to CME Group Index Holdings LLC ("CME") and have been sublicensed for use for certain purposes by IBD. IBD's products based on the "Dow Jones IndexesSM" are not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Down Jones, CME or their respective affiliates and Dow Jones, CME and their respective affiliates make no representation regarding the advisability of investing in such product(s).
The "NYSE Short Interest Data" is proprietary to and distributed by The New York Stock Exchange under license agreement.
The "S&P 500" data is the property of Chicago Mercantile Exchange, Inc. and its licensors. All rights reserved.
Any use of "Dow Jones", "Dow Jones Indexes", "NYSE Short Interest Data" and "S&P" 500 data is solely for your personal, non-commercial use pursuant to IBD's Terms and Conditions of Use. Any redistribution of the data is strictly prohibited.
Exchange data provided by BATS Global Markets, Inc. is provided under license agreement.  By using the Investors.com site and Service, You are agreeing to be bound by the BATS Subscriber Agreement and that:
a.    You have read and agree to be bound by the BATS Global Markets Inc. Subscriber Agreement found at
http://cdn.batstrading.com/resources/membership/Subscriber_Agreement.pdf
b.    IBD as a Data Recipient/Vendor (i) is not an agent of BATS Global Markets, Inc.; (ii) is not authorized to add to or delete any terms of provision from the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement; and (iii) is not authorized to modify any provision of the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement; and
c.    no provision has been added to or deleted from the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement and that no modifications have been made to it.  You warrant that You are legally able to undertake the obligations set forth in the Subscriber Agreement and agree to be bound by the terms of the BATS Global Markets, Inc. Subscriber Agreement.
The William O'Neil + Co. database and all data contained herein are provided by
William O'Neil + Co. Incorporated
and are used by IBD under license agreement. Daily Graphs and Daily Graphs Online are trademarks of William O'Neil + Co. Incorporated or its subsidiaries.  © 2015 William O'Neil + Co. Incorporated.  All Rights Reserved.
Charts provided by
MarketSmith, Inc.
are used by IBD under license agreement. MarketSmith is a registered trademark of MarketSmith, Incorporated.  © 2015 MarketSmith, Incorporated. All Rights Reserved.
INTERACTIVE DATA REAL-TIME SERVICES, INC.
All information (the “Interactive Data Information”) provided by Interactive Data Real-Time Services, Inc. (together with its affiliates collectively referred to as “Interactive Data”) is owned by or licensed to Interactive Data and any user is permitted to use such Interactive Data Information only for such user’s personal use. In no event shall any user publish, retransmit, redistribute or otherwise reproduce any Interactive Data Information in any format to anyone, and no user shall use any Interactive Data Information in or in connection with any business or commercial enterprise, including, without limitation, any securities, investment, accounting, banking, legal or media business or enterprise.
Prior to relying on any Interactive Data Information and/or the execution of a security trade based upon such Interactive Data Information, you are advised to consult with your broker or other financial representative to verify pricing information.
THE INTERACTIVE DATA INFORMATION IS PROVIDED TO THE USERS “AS IS.” NEITHER INTERACTIVE DATA, NOR ITS AFFILIATES, NOR ANY THIRD PARTY DATA PROVIDER MAKE ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND REGARDING THE INTERACTIVE DATA INFORMATION, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OR USE. NEITHER INTERACTIVE DATA, NOR ITS AFFILIATES, NOR ANY THIRD PARTY DATA PROVIDER WILL BE LIABLE TO ANY USER OR ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY INTERRUPTION, INACCURACY, ERROR OR OMISSION, REGARDLESS OF CAUSE, IN THE INTERACTIVE DATA INFORMATION OR FOR ANY DAMAGES (WHETHER DIRECT OR INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR EXEMPLARY) RESULTING THEREFROM.
DURATION/SURVIVAL
This Agreement remains in effect for so long as you have the ability to receive Data as contemplated by this Agreement. Paragraphs INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY NOTICES, PROPRIETARY DATA AND INFORMATION and DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES, TERMS AND LIABILITY survive termination of this Agreement. If any of the provisions of this Agreement, or application thereof to any Person or circumstance, shall to any extent be held invalid or unenforceable, the remainder of this Agreement, or the application of such terms or provisions to Persons or circumstances other than those as to which they are held invalid or unenforceable, shall not be affected thereby and each such term and provision of this Agreement shall be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.
Natural persons executing this Agreement warrant and represent that they are at least eighteen (18) years of age. Users and the Person executing this Agreement on behalf of any User that is a proprietorship, corporation, partnership or other entity, represent that such Person is duly authorized by all necessary and appropriate corporate or other action to execute the Agreement on behalf of User. This Agreement shall be deemed to have been made in the United States in Los Angeles, California and shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the validity and performance shall be governed by, the laws of California, without reference to principles of conflicts of laws thereof. User hereby consents to submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of or for Los Angeles, California in connection with any action or proceeding instituted relating to this Agreement.
Under the penalties for perjury, you understand that by using the Service, You certify that You have read and understand the above and agree to the terms and conditions.
In addition, your use of any of these services: Investors.com,
e
IBD, IBD
e
Tables, Leaderboard, Top-Rated Stocks Under $10, CAN SLIM Masters Program, MarketSmith, The William O'Neil + Co. 197 Industry Groups PDF or IBD Online Communities and Forums and any materials accessed therein indicates your full understanding and acceptance of the Terms of Use for that service, and indicates your full understanding and acceptance of our Investors.com Terms & Conditions Of Use. See below to review the corresponding Agreements and Supplemental Terms of Use for these services.
SUPPLEMENTAL TERMS OF USE AND SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENTS
TERMS OF USE AND SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT FOR Investors.com, eIBD™, IBD® eTables, Leaderboard®, and Top-Rated Stocks Under $10
These Supplemental Terms, in conjunction with the Investors.com Terms of Use Agreement, govern your use of each of the following Services as operated by Investor's Business Daily, Inc: Investors.com, eIBD, IBD eTables, Leaderboard, and Top-Rated Stocks Under $10. You agree to review the Agreement periodically to be aware of any changes. Your continued use constitutes acceptance of the changes.
ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS
Use of Investors.com, eIBD, IBD eTables, Leaderboard, or Top-Rated Stocks Under $10 and any materials accessed herein provides sufficient evidence of full acceptance by You of both the
Investors.com Terms of Use Agreement
and these Supplemental Terms of Use. Failure to comply in full will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal action taken against the offending individual(s) and organization(s) at the discretion of IBD. We reserve the right to block access to a service for anyone who violates our Terms of Use Agreements.
SUBSCRIPTION AND SECURITY
When You subscribe, You will fill out our registration form that requires various information about You. You are responsible for providing accurate subscription registration information and of updating it as required. IBD reserves the right to change or revoke Your User name, as it deems necessary. You are also responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of Your password. IBD may store the information provided by You in the registration process, and provide aggregate statistical information about Users to potential advertisers and other publications. IBD may use the information provided by You to inform You about other publications, products and services. For more details, see our Privacy Policy.
Subscriptions:  Registering for any Service implies a Subscription.  Subscriptions are offered with the option of being billed monthly (every 30 days), quarterly (every 90 days), semi-annually (every 180 days), or annually (every 360 days).
TERMS AND TERMINATION
Registering for a Service may imply an ongoing subscription based on Your selected Service, billing frequency and term. Your registration may constitute advanced consent to receive and pay for the subscription in the future on a continuing basis, without further consent, until You or IBD cancel the subscription. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Online Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services through our online process, Your subscription will automatically renew and continue until terminated by IBD or until You notify IBD of Your cancellation. You may cancel Your subscription at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Mail Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services by mailing in an order coupon to IBD, Your subscription will lapse at the end of the subscription term and will not automatically renew unless You have affirmatively checked the box indicating auto-renew on the order coupon. In the event You checked the auto-renew option, Your subscription will continue until terminated by IBD or until You notify IBD of Your cancellation. You may cancel Your subscription at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Inbound Call Center Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services as a result of Your placing a telephone call to IBD, Your subscription will automatically renew and continue until terminated by IBD or until You notify IBD of Your cancellation. You may cancel Your subscription at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Outbound Sales Call Orders:
If You order a paid subscription to any of our Services as a result of an outbound telephone sales call, Your subscription will lapse at the end of the subscription term. It will not automatically renew. To continue your subscription, please call Investor's Business Daily at (800) 831-2525. During the subscription term, You may cancel at any time. For details, refer to our Cancellation Policy and our Refund Policy.
Free Trial Orders:
SEE SECTION ON
FREE TRIALS, SPECIAL AND INTRODUCTORY OFFERS
ABOVE
CHANGES TO A SERVICE OR THE AGREEMENT
IBD may, at any time, change or discontinue any aspect or feature of a Service, including content, hours of availability, and equipment and software needed for access or use. You agree to be bound by future revisions of this Agreement. It is Your responsibility to visit the "Terms of Use" link at the bottom of Investors.com homepage periodically to review the most current terms and conditions. IBD may also impose limits on certain features and services or restrict Your access to parts or all a Service without notice or liability.
REFUND POLICY
We reserve the right to alter this policy at any time, at our discretion, without prior notification. A pro-rata refund of the unused portion of a current subscription may be granted at our discretion. You are obligated to pay the entire monthly fee for the month of cancellation regardless of when the termination was initiated during the month. Any subsequent refunds from a cancellation will be pro-rated based on a calendar monthly billing cycle regardless of the billing cycle selected during the initial registration, and any billing changes made during Your subscription period for a Service. After receiving a cancellation notice, IBD will promptly process any refund due. Please note: NO CASH/CHECK REFUND MAY BE MADE ON BANK CARD PURCHASES.
AUTO-RENEW AND CANCELLATION POLICY
Subscriptions purchased are auto-renewed at the end of the subscription term. You will not receive renewal reminders prior to being charged for such renewals. Renewal prices are subject to change without notice. In the event that IBD is unable to process Your credit card payment (when applicable), We reserve the right to terminate Your access without prior notice. You may cancel Your subscription at any time and IBD may terminate, or change a Service at any time. Cancellations received for Free Trial subscriptions before the end of the specified trial period will prevent a conversion to billing at the specified monthly or annual rate. All terminations shall be effective immediately upon receipt of notice. Should You object to any terms and conditions of this Agreement or any subsequent modifications or become dissatisfied with a Service in any way, You agree that Your sole recourse is to immediately (1) discontinue use of the Service(s); (2) terminate Your membership; and (3) notify IBD's Customer Service Department of Your termination. To cancel your subscription, contact IBD by phone at (800) 831-2525 in the United States, (800) 664-2013 in Canada, and at (310) 448-6600 in other Countries.
TERMINATION DUE TO BREACH
Without limiting the foregoing, IBD has the right to immediately terminate Your account in the event that You breach this Agreement. If Your account is terminated, You are and will remain responsible for all charges incurred up to the time of termination.
IBD ONLINE COMMUNITIES AND FORUMS; Rules, Policies, and Disclaimers
SUMMARY
IBD Online Communities and Forums are designed to facilitate the free exchange of ideas regarding specific investment related topics. For discussion purposes only, you may post copyrighted material owned by yourself, or owned by Investor's Business Daily, Inc. or MarketSmith® on the Investors.com Online Community and Forums pages, if you are a paid subscriber to Investor's Business Daily, eIBD™, Investors.com, or MarketSmith®. Due to the real-time nature of the IBD Online Communities and Forums, it is impossible for us to review all messages or confirm the validity of all information posted. Please note that we may or may not actively monitor the contents of posted messages and are not responsible for the content of any messages posted. In no instance does IBD or its affiliated companies endorse content or claims contained in the posted messages. The messages in the IBD Online Communities and Forums express the views of the author of the message, not necessarily the views of IBD or any entity affiliated with IBD. IBD does not make investment recommendations. Information posted by subscribers on IBD Online Communities and Forums should not be used as a substitute for independent research, and should not be relied on to trade or make investment decisions. Occasionally, a staff member may participate in the IBD Online Communities and Forums. In such case, we will clearly identify the participant as an IBD staff member.
CONTENT POSTED BY YOU
By submitting a username and password on any IBD Online Community and/or Forum registration page, you agree to be bound by the Investors.com Terms of Use as well as the Supplemental Terms set forth herein (collectively "Terms of Use").
IBD does not claim ownership of any content submitted by you. However, by posting content to public areas of Investors.com, you grant us, our parent, affiliates, and distributors a worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, non-exclusive and fully transferable and sublicensable right to use, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create derivative works from, distribute, and display comments you post, in whole or in part, throughout the world.
REMOVAL OF POSTS/MESSAGES
Any user who feels that a posted message is objectionable is encouraged to contact us immediately by e-mail at
ibdforumsadministrator@investors.com
. We have the ability to remove objectionable or violative messages. If it is determined that removal is necessary, we will make every effort to do so within a reasonable time frame. This is a manual process, however, so we may not be able to remove particular messages immediately.
California "Eraser" law (S.B. 568): If you are a California resident under 18 years of age and are a registered user of Investors.com, you have the right to request removal of content you posted in the IBD Online Communities and Forums. To request removal, please email
ibdforumsadministrator@investors.com
or call us at 800-831-2525.
RESTRICTED ACTIVITIES
You agree, through your use of this service, that your activities on the site shall not:
• be false, inaccurate or misleading;
• infringe on any third party's copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret or other proprietary rights or rights of publicity or privacy;
• violate any law, statute, ordinance or regulation;
• be defamatory, vulgar, hateful, obscene, profane, libelous, unlawfully threatening or unlawfully harassing;
• contain advertisements, chain letters, pyramid schemes, commercial messages, auctions, or solicitations;
• contain any viruses, impose an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the investors.com infrastructure, and not use any data mining, robot, spider, worms, time bombs, crawler, cancelbots, Trojan horse, or any data gathering or extraction method or manual process that may damage, detrimentally interfere with or intercept any system, data or personal information; and
• create liability for use or cause us to lose the services of our ISPs or other suppliers.
Violations of IBD Forums' policies will result in the termination of your account.
DISCLAIMER
IBD Online Communities and Forums, and related companies are not responsible for the accuracy, errors, or omissions of any information posted on the IBD Online Communities and Forums, including hyperlinks appearing in the IBD Online Communities and Forums, and are not responsible for any trading or investment decisions based on such information. The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission recognizes the growing possibility of Cyberfraud. Please refer to
www.sec.gov/investor/pubs/cyberfraud.htm
for further information, or to the SEC's main website at www.sec.gov or the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. at nasd.com.
Although the IBD does not and cannot review all the messages posted and is not responsible for the content of any of these messages, IBD reserves the right to delete any message for any or no reason whatsoever, including but not limited to excessive use of copyrighted material or excessive self promotion. IBD reserves the right to determine what constitutes "excessive" related to message removal. We do not guarantee or warrant the accuracy, completeness or usefulness of any message, and are not responsible for the contents of any message. You remain solely responsible for the content of your messages, and you agree to indemnify and hold harmless IBD and all affiliates with respect to any claim based upon transmission of your message(s). Any personal information you post in the IBD Online Communities and Forums becomes public information. You should exercise caution when deciding to disclose any personal information. IBD and related companies are not responsible for any events or damages arising from your disclosure of personal information in the IBD Online Communities and Forums.
PRIVACY
The IBD and affiliated companies take user privacy very seriously and will take reasonable measures to respect your privacy. However, under special circumstances, such as to comply with court orders or other legal obligations, IBD may provide personally identifiable information to third parties that may include IP addresses. Otherwise IBD will only use your information in accordance with our
Privacy
Statement. IBD does not knowingly allow access to or collect information from children under the age of 13. If you are not over the age of 13, click cancel below and do not register. Refer to
https://www.ftc.gov/enforcement/rules/rulemaking-regulatory-reform-proceedings/childrens-online-privacy-protection-rule
for further information.
The Subscription Terms available via the link below govern Your access and use of MarketSmith.
MarketSmith®
SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT FOR USE OF
MARKETSMITH® ONLINE INVESTMENT RESEARCH TOOL
Copyright 2021 Investor's Business Daily, LLC
Registration Benefits
Sign In
Information
1
2
3
4
IBD Forums
Participate in an IBD Forum and connect with other IBD subscribers.
IBD Screen Center
Access six valuable screens that show you top stocks in different categories.
My Stock Lists
Get customized stock lists to track your portfolio, watch lists and more!
My Routine
Create shortcuts to your favorite Investors.com features.
Register
Sign In
Sign In
Information
Register »
Can't access your account? »
NEED TO REGISTER?:
I
am
a current subscriber and need to register on
Investors.com.
I
am not
a current subscriber and want to register
for free membership on Investors.com.
BACK TO TOP
About Investor's Business Daily
Founded by William J. O’Neil, Investor’s Business Daily provides exclusive stock lists, market data and research, helping investors take advantage of the The IBD Methodology to make more money in the stock market.
FOLLOW US:
IBD on Facebook
IBD on Twitter
IBD on Google+
IBD on Linkedin
Getting Started
About Us
Reviews
Site Map
Your Ad Choices
Advertising
Markets & Research
IBD Stock Charts
Stock Checkup
Stock Quotes
Stock Market Today
The Big Picture
My Stock Lists
Premium Tools
IBD Live
Leaderboard
SwingTrader
MarketSurge
IBD Digital
MarketDiem
Dow Jones Network
The Wall Street Journal
Barron’s
MarketWatch
Dow Jones Smart Money
Dow Jones Network
|
The Wall Street Journal
|
Barron’s
|
MarketWatch
|
Dow Jones Smart Money
Privacy Notice
|
Terms of Use
|
Accessibility
Information in Investor’s Business Daily is for informational and educational purposes only and should not be construed as an offer, recommendation, solicitation, or rating to buy or sell securities. The information has been obtained from sources we believe to be reliable, but we make no guarantee as to its accuracy, timeliness, or suitability, including with respect to information that appears in closed captioning. Historical investment performances are no indication or guarantee of future success or performance. Authors/presenters may own the stocks they discuss. We make no representations or warranties regarding the advisability of investing in any particular securities or utilizing any specific investment strategies. Information is subject to change without notice. For information on use of our services, please see our
Terms of Use
. *Real-time prices by Nasdaq Last Sale. Real-time quote and/or trade prices are not sourced from all markets. Ownership data provided by LSEG and Estimate data provided by FactSet.
IBD, IBD Digital, IBD Live, IBD Weekly, Investor's Business Daily, Leaderboard, MarketDiem, MarketSurge and other marks are trademarks owned by Investor's Business Daily, LLC.
© 2025 Investor's Business Daily, LLC. All rights reserved.
Stock Research
IBD Charts
Stocks on the Move
Screen Center
IBD Stock Checkup
More Premium Products
e
Tables
Stocks Under $10
MarketSurge
Investing Research
ETF Center
IBD's ETF Market Strategy
IBD's 197 Industry Groups
IBD Industry Sector Finder
Top Story
Dow Jones Futures Jump 400 Points On Trump Tariff News; Nvidia, Tesla Rally
08:40 AM ET - The Dow Jones Industrial Average and other major stock futures rallied Monday on reports that President Donald Trump may exclude ...
Register to read article »
Latest News
IBM Called Best Idea Amid Enterprise 'Demand Shift' For AI Applications
Bitcoin Price Rises After Tariff Comments; ETF Inflows Rebound
Dow Jones Futures Jump 400 Points On Trump Tariff News; Nvidia, Tesla Rally
BYD Earnings Top Views With Tesla Rival Charging Up Tech
Dow Jones Futures Jump On Trump Tariff 'Flexibility'; Now Look For This Signal
The Cream Of The Crop: 5 Biotechs That Outrank Most Stocks
How To Invest: Short Interest Can Be Your Secret Weapon For Identifying Stock Rallies
Quick Links
Stock Market Today
The Big Picture
Investing
Business
Economy
Technology
Management
Politics
Retirement
Special Reports
Latest Commentary
Trump Tariffs: EU Hits Back As Steel, Aluminum Tariffs Kick In; S&P 500 Bounces
Trump Executive Orders: S&P 500 Braces For Tariffs, Deportations On Inauguration Day
How Elon Musk, Donald Trump And DOGE Will Take On The Federal Government, And What It Means For The S&P 500
Donald Trump Threatens Big Tariff Hikes On China, Canada, Mexico On Day One
GOP Wins Battle For House Control, Putting Full Trump Agenda In Play
Donald Trump Taps Elon Musk, Vivek Ramaswamy To Run Government Efficiency Effort
Quick Links
IBD/TIPP Poll
Columnists
IBD University
Investing lessons created by IBD experts to help you master the CAN SLIM Investing system, tips for buying and selling stocks, while giving you a routine for using IBD. Our lessons are designed for all investing levels to help you succeed.
Learn how to invest using IBD
IBD University Topics
Getting Started with IBD
The CAN SLIM Investing System
How to Time the Stock Market
How to Find and Evaluate Stocks
How to Read Stock Charts
How to Buy Stocks
When to Sell Stocks
Time Saving Routine Using IBD
Quick Links
Live Investing Workshops
Homestudy Courses
Investor's Corner
Educational & Strategy Videos
ASK IBD
IBD Key Terms
IBD Meetup
Quick Links
Market Wrap
IBD Stock Analysis
IBD Investing Show
IBD 2-Minute Tips
Education
Market Timing Series
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.google.com/privacy/ads:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Advertising
Advertising keeps Google and many of the websites and services you use free of charge. We work hard to make sure that ads are safe, unobtrusive, and as relevant as possible. For example, you won’t see pop-up ads on Google, and we terminate the accounts of hundreds of thousands of publishers and advertisers that violate our policies each year – including ads containing malware, ads for counterfeit goods, or ads that attempt to misuse your personal information.
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses cookies in advertising
Cookies help to make advertising more effective. Without cookies, it’s harder for an advertiser to reach its audience, or to know how many ads were shown and how many clicks they received.
Many websites, such as news sites and blogs, partner with Google to show ads to their visitors. Working with our partners, we may use cookies for a number of purposes, such as to stop you from seeing the same ad over and over again, to detect and stop click fraud, and to show ads that are likely to be more relevant (such as ads based on websites you have visited).
We store a record of the ads we serve in our logs. These
server logs
typically include your web request, IP address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser or, if you are signed-in, that may uniquely identify you. We store this data for a number of reasons, the most important of which are to improve our services and to maintain the security of our systems. We anonymize this log data by removing part of the IP address (after 9 months) and cookie information (after 18 months).
Our advertising cookies
To help our partners manage their advertising and websites, we offer many products, including AdSense, AdWords, Google Analytics, and a range of DoubleClick-branded services. When you visit a page or see an ad that uses one of these products, either on Google services or on other sites and apps, various cookies may be sent to your browser.
These may be set from a few different domains, including google.com, doubleclick.net, googlesyndication.com, or googleadservices.com, or the domain of our partners’ sites. Some of our advertising products enable our partners to use other services in conjunction with ours (like an ad measurement and reporting service), and these services may send their own cookies to your browser. These cookies will be set from their domains.
See more detail about the
types of cookies used by Google
and our partners and
how we use them
.
How you can control advertising cookies
You can use
ad settings
to manage the Google ads you see and turn off personalized ads. Even if you turn off personalized ads, you may still see ads based on factors such as your general location derived from your IP address, your browser type, and your search terms.
You can also manage many companies’ cookies used for online advertising via the consumer choice tools created under self-regulation programs in many countries, such as the US-based
aboutads.info choices
page or the EU-based
Your Online Choices
.
Finally, you can
manage cookies in your web browser
.
Other technologies used in advertising
Google’s advertising systems may use other technologies, including Flash and HTML5, for functions like display of interactive ad formats. We may use the
IP address
, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also select advertising based on information about your computer or device, such as the time and date, your device model, browser type, or sensors in your device like the accelerometer.
Location
Google’s ad products may receive or infer information about your location from a variety of sources. For example, we may use the IP address to identify your general location; we may receive precise location from your mobile device; we may infer your location from your search queries; and websites or apps that you use may send information about your location to us.  Google uses location information in our ads products to infer demographic information, to improve the relevance of the ads you see, to measure ad performance and to report aggregate statistics to advertisers.
Advertising identifiers for mobile apps
To serve ads in services where cookie technology may not be available (for example, in mobile applications), we may use technologies that perform similar functions to cookies. Sometimes Google links the identifier used for advertising on mobile applications to an advertising cookie on the same device in order to coordinate ads across your mobile apps and mobile browser. This can happen, for example, when you see an ad within an app that launches a web page in your mobile browser. This also helps us improve the reports we give to our advertisers on the effectiveness of their campaigns.
Ads you see on your device may be personalized based on its Advertising ID. On Android devices, you can:
Reset your device’s advertising ID
, which replaces the current ID with a new one. Apps can still show you personalized ads, but for a while they may not be as relevant or interesting to you.
Delete your device’s advertising ID
, which deletes the advertising ID and doesn't assign a new one. Apps can still show you ads, but they may not be as relevant or interesting to you. You won't see ads based on this advertising ID, but you may still see ads based on other factors, like the information you’ve shared with apps.
To make changes to the advertising ID on your Android device, follow the instructions below.
Android
Reset your device’s advertising ID
To reset your device’s advertising ID:
On your Android device, go to
Settings
.
Tap
Privacy
>
Ads
.
Tap
Reset advertising ID
and confirm your changes.
Delete your device’s advertising ID
To delete your device’s advertising ID:
On your Android device, go to
Settings
.
Tap
Privacy
>
Ads
.
Tap
Delete advertising ID
and confirm your changes.
Your advertising ID will be reset or deleted, but apps may have their own settings using other types of identifiers, which can also affect the types of ads you see.
On some older versions of Android
If your Android device’s version is 4.4 or older:
Open
Settings
Tap
Privacy
>
Advanced
>
Ads
Turn on
Opt out of Ads Personalization
and confirm your changes.
iOS
Devices with iOS use Apple’s Advertising Identifier. To learn more about your choices for use of this identifier, visit the
Settings
app on your device.
Connected TV/Over-the-Top
Advertising identifiers for connected TV
Connected TVs are another area where cookie technology is not available, and, instead, Google will rely on device identifiers designed for use in advertising to serve ads. Many connected TV devices support an identifier for advertising that is similar in function to mobile device identifiers. These identifiers are built to give users the option to reset them or to opt out of personalized advertising entirely.
The following “Ads” settings are available on TVs with the following consistent language:
Reset advertising ID
Delete advertising ID
Opt out of Ads Personalization (on or off)
Ads by Google (links to About Google ad personalization)
Your advertising ID (long string)
These Ads settings are available in the following paths on Google TV and Android TV respectively.
Google TV
Consistent path to Ads:
Settings
Privacy
Ads
Android TV
Ads settings show up in one of two general paths for Android TV depending on the TV manufacturer/model. In Android TV, partners have the freedom to adapt the Settings path. It’s up to the partner which path they use to best fit their custom TV experience but below are the common paths to Ad settings.
Path A:
Settings
About
Legal Information
Ads
Path B:
Settings
Devices Preferences
About
Legal Information
Ads
Non-Google Devices
Many connected TV devices support identifiers for advertising and offer ways for users to opt out of personalized advertising. A full list of those devices, and ways users can opt out, is kept updated on the Network Advertising Initiative’s website here:
https://thenai.org/opt-out/connected-tv-choices/
.
What determines the ads by Google that I see?
Many decisions are made to determine which ad you see.
Sometimes the ad you see is based on your current or past location. Your IP address is usually a good indication of your approximate location. So you might see an ad on the homepage of YouTube.com that promotes a forthcoming movie in your country, or a search for ‘pizza’ might return results for pizza places in your town.
Sometimes the ad you see is based on the context of a page. If you’re looking at a page of gardening tips, you might see ads for gardening equipment.
Sometimes you might also see an ad on the web that’s based on your app activity or activity on Google services; an in-app ad that’s based on your web activity; or an ad based on your activity on another device.
Sometimes the ad you see on a page is served by Google but selected by another company. For example, you might have registered with a newspaper website. From information you’ve given the newspaper, it can make decisions about which ads to show you, and it can use Google’s ad serving products to deliver those ads.
The ad you see on a household device, such as a connected TV (such as a Smart TV), may be related to the web or app activity from devices within the same household.
You may also see ads on Google products and services, including Search, Gmail, and YouTube, based on information, such as your email address, that you provided to advertisers and the advertisers then shared with Google.
Why am I seeing ads by Google for products I’ve viewed?
You may see ads for products you previously viewed. Let’s suppose you visit a website that sells golf clubs, but you don’t buy those clubs on your first visit. The website owner might want to encourage you to return and complete your purchase. Google offers services that let website operators target their ads to people who visited their pages.
For this to work, Google either reads a cookie that’s already in your browser or places a cookie in your browser when you visit the golfing site (assuming your browser lets this happen).
When you visit another site that works with Google, which may have nothing to do with golfing, you might see an ad for those golf clubs. That’s because your browser sends Google the same cookie. In turn, we may use that cookie to serve you an ad that could encourage you to buy those golf clubs.
Your visit to the golfing site may also be used by Google to show you personalized ads when you later search for golf clubs on Google.
We do have restrictions on this type of ad. For example, we prohibit advertisers from selecting an audience based on sensitive information, such as health information or religious beliefs.
Learn more about
Google ads
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://www.google.com/intl/en/privacy/privacy-policy.html:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
http://www.omniture.com/en/privacy:
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/fragments/homepage/summit/summit-2025-marquee
#000000
cover
cover
center, cover
New Release
Agentic AI at Adobe
Give your teams the productivity partner and always-on insights they need to deliver true personalization at scale with Adobe Experience Platform Agent Orchestrator.
Learn more
#000000
bottom, cover
bottom, cover
bottom, center, cover
SUMMIT 2025
The latest at Adobe Summit.
Watch Adobe Summit
style
static-links, l-spacing
masonry
span 8, span 4
Explore all Adobe for Business products.
Content management
Creativity & design
Data & analytics
Campaign management
Document productivity
Workflow management
active tab
1
id
homepage
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/assets/videos/homepage/media_12f20ee7d8f1f583c9d2b4c92d5e906944c08a53c.mp4#_autoplay1
AI-powered content generation, delivery, and performance.
Meet the ever-growing demand for content with enterprise-grade solutions that give you reusable capabilities, scalable content, composable commerce and powerful personalization.
Adobe GenStudio for Performance Marketing.
Scale content with a generative AI-first application that lets you create, deliver, and optimize campaign assets.
Learn more
Adobe Experience Manager Sites.
Create high-performance pages across any digital property — from web to mobile to apps.
Learn more
NEW! Brand Concierge.
Give your customers a conversational assistant to answer questions, deliver research, and recommend products.
Learn more
Adobe Experience Manager Assets.
Use a cloud-native DAM with AI tools to manage assets across your organization and deliver them to any application.
Learn more
Adobe Commerce.
Get a composable ecommerce solution that lets you quickly create global, multi-brand B2C and B2B experiences — all from one platform.
Learn more
tab
homepage, 1
style
l spacing
Standout content that boosts your brand and experiences.
Adobe’s creative solutions for enterprises bring together the most comprehensive creative technology with the power of generative AI to unleash creativity, scale content production, and unlock strategic capacity across your organization.
Creative Cloud for Enterprise.
Boost creative capacity — from ideation to final assets — with the world’s leading tools for creative content, powered by commercially safe Firefly generative AI.
Learn more
Frame.io.
Streamline review and approval for all work-in-process media and assets — from documents to design files and videos — on a single secure surface.
Learn more
Adobe Firefly Services.
Automate the production of high-quality asset variations across channels, audiences, markets, and media types to power personalization, localization, and ecommerce.
Learn more
Adobe Express.
Empower all business teams — from marketing, to sales, to HR — to self-serve and easily create standout content while staying on brand.
Learn more
#F8F8F8
Looking for small business solutions?
Explore options
tab
homepage, 2
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/assets/videos/homepage/media_1af48a704c355dc84f9ce792e8f82b16595d73cdc.mp4#_autoplay1
Data and insights that give your business a competitive edge.
Connect the entire data-to-insights-to-action workflow with a centralized system for data collection, processing, analysis, B2C and B2B audience segmentation, reporting, and output — for better business decisions and customer experiences.
Adobe Analytics.
Advanced analytics solutions combine cross-channel customer data, content analytics, and product analytics.
Learn more
Adobe Real-Time CDP.
Unify data from all channels into real-time customer and account profiles, all while respecting customer privacy.
Learn more
tab
homepage, 3
style
l spacing
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/assets/videos/homepage/media_159a0d2949a8ff3ad273fcfefd0692df2da82ed8b.mp4#_autoplay1
Advanced marketing automation, management, and insights.
Deliver real-time, personalized, multi-channel journeys for both B2B and B2C customers with collaborative tools that let sales and marketing teams work in sync.
Adobe Journey Optimizer.
Leverage a single canvas for managing omnichannel journeys and one-to-one offers for all your customers.
Learn more
Adobe Journey Optimizer B2B Edition.
Empower marketing and sales teams to engage buying groups with personalized, AI-powered content and journeys.
Learn more
Adobe Marketo Engage.
Use a B2B marketing automation platform to attract, segment, and nurture prospects and score and manage leads.
Learn more
Adobe Mix Modeler.
Measure the impact of every marketing dollar spent across paid, earned, and owned channels to optimize your marketing investments.
Learn more
tab
homepage, 4
style
l spacing
Accelerate document workflows and deliver more impact.
Help knowledge workers be more productive with Adobe Document Cloud, a secure, AI-powered solution for viewing, sharing, commenting, creation, and automation of document workflows.
Leverage Adobe Acrobat AI Assistant to quickly harness company-wide knowledge from documents.
Accelerate development of high-quality summaries and insights from various documents and file formats while also getting verifiable attributions.
Speed up review and analysis of complex documents — such as contracts for financial, legal, and compliance teams.
Reduce the time and cost required to generate content that’s the correct length and formatted for fit-for-purpose inclusion in presentations, communications, blogs, training materials, and more.
Learn more
#F8F8F8
Looking for small business solutions?
Explore options
tab
homepage, 5
style
no spacing
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/assets/videos/homepage/media_138beaf373b8bd116e7a4331a0e640e925d40e166.mp4#_autoplay1
End-to-end enterprise work management.
Put Adobe Workfront to work for your enterprise with collaborative and simplified workflows that let cross-functional teams centralize, plan, orchestrate, and execute work.
Connect fragmented planning data to power enterprise-wide alignment and collaboration.
Leverage AI to ingest creative briefs for automated project setup and to eliminate manual tasks.
Let creatives access Workfront tasks and project details directly in Adobe Creative Cloud applications using integrated workflows.
Give stakeholders, legal partners, and everyone in between robust dashboards for reviewing and approving work.
Learn more
tab
homepage, 6
style
l spacing
Business solutions from Adobe — the customer experience orchestration leader.
Adobe solutions integrate our best-in-class products to help you tackle pressing business challenges.
#F5F5F5
Personalization at scale
Modern marketers know that experience is the difference. Customers don’t just want products. They want to engage with brands in ways that feel personal, authentic, and human — even when it’s digital. We know it’s not easy to make every connection personal, but Adobe has the tools to help you succeed.
Learn more
#F5F5F5
Unified customer experience
Transform your customer experiences from isolated interactions into a purposeful customer journey. With Adobe, you can organize and connect your customer data using powerful journey orchestration. This gives you new insights into audience behavior — so you can continuously optimize individual experiences across every channel.
Learn more
center, cover
center, cover
bottom, center, cover
Content supply chain
Adobe offers an end-to-end solution that helps organizations optimize their entire planning, creation, management, delivery, and optimization processes for content. Powered by AI, it lets your teams create content beyond human scale, improve marketing agility, accelerate time to market, and increase content ROI.
Learn more
#000000
Creative and production solutions for the enterprise
Let teams across your organization create standout, on-brand content with greater speed, scale, and relevance. Powered by Firefly — the most comprehensive AI platform for creative content that’s safe for business use — these solutions help your organization move confidently from experimenting with AI to delivering value.
Learn more
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/assets/videos/homepage/media_11d46a3e56f3c5e60b829a1559337e9ca462593fc.mp4#_autoplay
#F5F5F5
B2B GTM Orchestration
Experience Cloud lets you deliver account-based experiences that resonate with buyers and differentiate your brand. Advanced features such as real-time data, unified 360-degree profiles, buying groups, tailored journeys, and AI-driven workflows make every customer interaction relevant and let you deliver a seamless digital journey that’s directly integrated with the sales process.
Learn more
#F5F5F5
Document productivity
Improve productivity and empower your teams with actionable insights from multiple documents and file types with Document Cloud, a secure, AI-powered solution that accelerates workflows. Use Acrobat AI Assistant to synthesize and analyze research studies, reports, transcripts, and more.
Learn more
style
static-links, l-spacing
masonry
Full-width
span 4, span 8
span 8, span 4
Full-width
https://main--bacom--adobecom.hlx.page/fragments/homepage/customer-stories-section
style
l spacing
Let us show you the full power of Adobe business solutions.
style
Grid width 6
Marketo Configurator Wednesday, February 12, 2025 at 12:01
Title
Description
style
l spacing
title
Adobe Business: Products & Services with Adobe Experience Cloud
CardDescription
Meet all your customer's needs with Adobe's Experience Cloud. Uncover the insight and growth potential and discover what Adobe can do for you.
cardDate
2023-04-13
altCardImageText
Adobe: Changing the world through personalized digital experiences.
cardImage
primaryTag
caas:content-type/product-page
Tags
caas:content-type/product-page
ADOBE FOR BUSINESS
ADOBE FOR BUSINESS
Creativity and marketing in the age of AI.
Creativity and marketing in the age of AI.
Watch Adobe Summit live
Watch Adobe Summit live
Agentic AI at Adobe
Agentic AI at Adobe
Learn more
Learn more
The latest at Adobe Summit.
The latest at Adobe Summit.
Watch live
Watch live
Explore all Adobe for Business products.
Explore all Adobe for Business products.
AI-powered content generation, delivery, and performance.
AI-powered content generation, delivery, and performance.
Standout content that boosts your brand and experiences.
Standout content that boosts your brand and experiences.
Explore options
Explore options
Data and insights that give your business a competitive edge.
Data and insights that give your business a competitive edge.
Advanced marketing automation, management, and insights.
Advanced marketing automation, management, and insights.
Accelerate document workflows and deliver more impact.
Accelerate document workflows and deliver more impact.
End-to-end enterprise work management.
End-to-end enterprise work management.
Business solutions from Adobe — the customer experience orchestration leader.
Business solutions from Adobe — the customer experience orchestration leader.
Personalization at scale
Personalization at scale
Unified customer experience
Unified customer experience
Content supply chain
Content supply chain
Creative and production solutions for the enterprise
Creative and production solutions for the enterprise
B2B GTM Orchestration
B2B GTM Orchestration
Document productivity
Document productivity
Adobe is transforming the world’s biggest brands.
Adobe is transforming the world’s biggest brands.
Read story
Read story
Let us show you the full power of Adobe business solutions.
Let us show you the full power of Adobe business solutions.
Adobe family of companies
Adobe family of companies
personalized
personalized
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
opt-out
opt-out
Adobe Family of Companies
Adobe Family of Companies
Sub-policy 3
http://leadserve.opt-intelligence.com/privacy.html:
ConnX
Toggle navigation
grade
Pricing
school
Learn
person_add
Sign Up
fingerprint
Login
Sub-policy 4
http://www.investors.com/terms/#privacy:
INVESTOR'S BUSINESS DAILY TERMS OF USE
Last updated March 01, 2024
ACCEPTANCE OF AGREEMENT
Welcome to Investors.com (the "
Site
") presented by Investor's Business Daily, LLC ("
IBD
", "
Company
", "
we
", or "
us
"). The following terms and conditions, together with any documents incorporated by reference (this "
Agreement
") govern your use, whether as a guest or a registered User, of the Site and any other sites, products, services, features, contents, mobile sites, and applications/or offered by us from time to time that link or otherwise refer to this Agreement, (collectively, including the Site, the "
Services
").
Your use of the Services is also subject to additional guidelines or rules posted in certain areas of the Service. We may also provide products or services that are governed by supplemental terms as may be provided by the Company, from time to time, which may include, but are not limited to, IBD Digital
®
, Leaderboard
®
, MarketDiem, SwingTrader, IBD Live
®
, MarketSurge, Online Courses, newsletters, webinars, podcasts, online events, and/or related applications. Subscription terms, including, billing periods may vary for each Service and will be provided for the specific Service during the ordering process. Such additional guidelines, rules, and/or supplemental terms are also incorporated into this Agreement. Failure to comply in full with the Agreement may result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal actions taken against offending individuals and/or organizations in our sole discretion. We reserve the right to block your access to the Services for violation of this Agreement. This Agreement may be updated at any time without notice (though if changes are significant, we will typically provide you with notice, which may include posting a notice on the Site or other notice methods).  You agree to review the Agreement periodically to be aware of such modifications. Your continued use of the Services constitutes acceptance of any changes to this Agreement.
Please read this Agreement carefully before you start to use the Services.
BY ACCESSING AND/OR USING THE SERVICES, YOU ACCEPT AND AGREE TO BE BOUND AND ABIDE BY THIS AGREEMENT AND THE COMPANY'S
PRIVACY POLICY
(WHICH IS INCORPORATED HEREIN BY REFERENCE) AND TO COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE LAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS (COLLECTIVELY, "APPLICABLE LAWS").
If you do not want to agree to this Agreement and the Privacy Policy, you must not access or use the Services.
PLEASE NOTE THAT THE "
ARBITRATION & CLASS ACTION WAIVER AGREEMENT
" SECTION BELOW CONTAINS PROVISIONS THAT REQUIRE WITH LIMITED EXCEPTIONS, ALL DISPUTES ARISING BETWEEN YOU AND THE COMPANY UNDER THIS AGREEMENT TO BE RESOLVED IN BINDING ARBITRATION, AND NOT IN COURT, AND THAT YOU AND THE COMPANY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO BRING OR
PARTICIPATE IN A CLASS ACTION IN CONNECTION WITH SUCH DISPUTES.  PLEASE READ THE ARBITRATION & CLASS ACTION WAIVER AGREEMENT CAREFULLY BEFORE USING THE SERVICES.
BY USING THE SERVICES AND ACCEPTING THIS AGREEMENT, YOU AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THE ARBITRATION & CLASS ACTION WAIVER AGREEMENT.
DEFINITIONS
"
IBD
" (also referred to as "
Company
", "
we
", "
us
", or "
our
") means Investor's Business Daily, LLC, its affiliates, agents, information providers, and/or licensors (as applicable). The word "
User(s)
" means any Person (also referred to as "
you
" or "
yours
") visiting, accessing, or using the Services or holding a Subscription (as defined below) to any Service. The word "
Person(s)
" means any natural person, proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other entity whatsoever. The word "
or
" includes the word "
and
". The words "
includes
" or "
including
" means "includes, but is not limited to" or "including, but not limited to."
Subscription(s)
" means a subscription, including any Trial (as defined below), to any Service.
USE LIMITATIONS
ELIGIBILITY
The Services are offered and available to Users who are at least eighteen (18) years of age and reside in the United States. Users and the Person executing this Agreement on behalf of any User that is a proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other entity, represent that such Person is duly authorized by all necessary and appropriate corporate or other action to execute the Agreement on behalf of User. By visiting, accessing, subscribing to, and/or using the Services, you represent and warrant that you are of legal age to form a binding contract with the Company and meet all of the foregoing eligibility requirements. If you do not meet all of these requirements, you must not access or use the Services.
To access the Services or some of the resources therein, you may be asked to provide certain registration details or other information. It is a condition of your use of the Services that all the information you provide is accurate, current, and complete. You agree that all information you provide to register for a Service or otherwise, including through the use of any interactive features on the Services, is governed by the Privacy Policy, and you consent to all actions we take with respect to your personal information consistent with the Privacy Policy. For purposes of this Agreement, "
personal information
" means information that relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual or household.
The Company may require proof of your identity or eligibility at any time to participate or continue to participate in a Service.  Failure to provide evidence of identity or eligibility satisfactory to the Company, and determined in the Company's sole discretion, may result in suspension or termination of your account(s) with the Company and/or access to the Services.  The Company reserves the right to monitor all activities on the Services, including any effort to establish accounts in violation of this Agreement and to deny access to anyone, including those users who use proxy servers and/or IP addresses residing in certain geographical areas.
PROHIBITED USES
You may only use the Services for lawful purposes and in accordance with this Agreement. You specifically agree to not:
Violate any Applicable Laws while using the Services;
Use the Services for the purpose of exploiting, harming, or attempting to exploit or harm any Person in any way, including minors by exposing them to inappropriate content, asking for personally identifiable information, or otherwise;
Use the Services to transmit, or procure the sending of, any advertising or promotional material, including any "junk mail", "chain letter", "spam", or any other similar solicitation;
Impersonate or attempt to impersonate the Company, a Company employee, another User, or any other Person (including by using e-mail addresses or user names associated with any of the foregoing);
Engage in any conduct that restricts or inhibits anyone's use or enjoyment of the Services, or which, as determined by us, may harm the Company or Users of the Services or expose them to liability;
Attempt to disable, overburden, damage, or impair the Site or interfere with any other party's use of the Services, including their ability to engage in real-time activities through the Services;
Take any action that imposes an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the Company's technical infrastructure;
Copy the Services and/or any of the content, data, and/or materials therein for any other unauthorized purpose without our prior written consent;
Use any data mining, robot, spider, crawler, cancelbots, or other devices, processes, or means to access the Services and/or facilitate the misuse of the Services for any purpose, including monitoring or copying any of the content, data, or materials that are part of the Services;
Reverse-engineer, disassemble, or decompile the Services and/or any content, data, and/or materials therein, or attempt to do the same;
Use any device, software, or routine that interferes with the proper working of the Services or otherwise attempt to interfere with the proper working of the Services;
Introduce any viruses, trojan horses, worms, logic bombs, or other material which is malicious or technologically harmful or otherwise attempt to gain unauthorized access to, interfere with, damage, or disrupt any parts of the Services, the server(s) on which the Services are stored, or any server, computer, or database connected to the Services;
Attack the Services via a denial-of-service attack, a distributed denial-of-service attack, or another similar attack; or
Violate any posted viewing or retrieval limitations including the following restrictions per 24-hour period for each User:
IBD Stock Checkup® feature is limited to 300 views and/or retrievals;
IBD Charts feature is limited to 1500 views/and/or retrievals; and
IBD Quotes feature is limited to 1500 views and/or retrievals.
You may not participate in coordinated efforts or group activities with others in order to violate or to exceed these use limitations.  Failure to comply with these limitations will result in cessation of access and use privileges and may result in legal action against the offending individuals and/or organizations at the discretion of the Company.
GEOGRAPHIC RESTRICTIONS
The owner of the Services is based in the United States. We provide the Services for use only by Persons located in the United States. We make no claims that the Services or any of its content is accessible or appropriate outside of the United States. Access to the Services may not be legal by certain Persons or in certain countries. If you access the Services from outside the United States, you do so on your own initiative and are responsible for compliance with local laws.
SUBSCRIPTIONS, OFFERS, FEES, & REFUNDS
TERM & TERMINATION
Your Subscription will automatically renew and continue until terminated by the Company or until you notify the Company of your cancellation. You may cancel your Subscription at any time. Your registration constitutes advanced consent to receive and pay for the Subscription in the future on a continuing basis, without further consent, until you or the Company cancels the Subscription. For details on cancellation, refer to our
AUTO-RENEWAL & CANCELLATION POLICY
and our
REFUND POLICY
.
The Company has the right to terminate your subscription, account or disable OR change any user name, password or other identifier, whether chosen by you or provided by us, at any time in our sole discretion for any or no reason, including if, in our opinion, you have violated any provision of THIS AGREEMENT.
AUTO-RENEWAL & CANCELLATION POLICY
Purchased Subscriptions are auto-renewed at the end of the Subscription term and will continue until canceled by either you or the Company.
You may or may not receive renewal reminders prior to being charged for such renewals. Renewal prices are subject to change. In the event that the Company is unable to process your credit card payment (when applicable) for a payment or renewal, we reserve the right to terminate your access to Services without prior notice. You may cancel your Subscription at any time and the Company may terminate, or change a Service at any time.
If you wish to cancel your subscription, you will not be credited with a prorated refund for the unused portion of your subscription. You will retain access until the end of your term and your subscription will not be auto-renewed.
Should you object to any terms and conditions of this Agreement or any subsequent modifications or become dissatisfied with a Service in any way, you agree that your sole recourse is to immediately: (1) discontinue use of the Service(s); (2) terminate your Subscription; and (3) notify the Company's Customer Success Department of your termination. To cancel a Subscription, you can either: (a) call the Company's Customer Success Department at 1-800-831-2525 in the United States, or 001-310-448-6600 for international calls (hours of availability are available at
askinvestorhelp.force.com/s/
); or (b) login to your account at
www.Investors.com
and click "My IBD" to view your profile and then click on "View My Online Subscription" and click cancel.
FREE TRIALS & SPECIAL INTRODUCTORY OFFERS
If you sign up for a trial or introductory offer to a Service (collectively, a "
Trial
"), your Trial will automatically convert into a continuous, regularly priced paid Subscription at the end of the Trial period unless a cancellation request is received prior to the end of the specified offer period as further set forth below. Such regular Subscriptions will auto-renew unless otherwise stated in the offer that you accepted. For details, refer to our
AUTO-RENEWAL & CANCELLATION POLICY
and our
REFUND POLICY
.
If the Company makes special offers, introductory offers, offers promotions, or sends invitations to participate in a Trial, such offers do not automatically convert into full-priced paid Subscriptions and do not require cancellation before the end of said Trial, such offer will include specific language to this effect. Unless otherwise stated in the Trial offer, the following restrictions will apply to Trials:
You must be a new customer;
Offers for the Weekly Print and other physical products are available to United States residents only and delivery restrictions will apply;
You must not have taken a discounted offer in the previous six (6) months;
You and/or your household are limited to one offer in a six (6) month period;
Trials may not be combined; and
Other conditions may apply.
All Trials are subject to change without prior notification. Note that for Trials you may be billed for a regularly priced paid Subscription of a Service up to seven (7) days prior to the end of the Trial period, however, if you cancel within the Trial period, such billed amount will be refunded. If you do not want to be charged, you must give notice of cancellation at least seven (7) days before the end of the Trial period.
RESTRICTIONS
Certain Services may be subject to restrictions including, without limitation, geographic limitations, as may be posted by the Company from time to time.  Please read the terms of each offer carefully before accepting. The Company reserves the right to immediately terminate your Subscription, including any Trial, to any Service, at any time, if it determines (at its sole discretion) there has been abuse of these restrictions.
SUBSCRIPTION HOLDS
The Company may permit you to temporarily suspend your Subscription for certain print Services for a limited time, for example, during a vacation.  You may not suspend digital Services.  However, please note that if you have subscribed to digital Services bundled or otherwise in connection with a print Service, your access to such digital Services will be suspended during your suspension of the connected print Service.
PRICING, BILLING, FEES, & TRANSACTIONS
When you purchase a Service, the price and billing period, if applicable, will be made clear during the order process. You agree to pay the price that is stated at the time of your order, as well as any applicable taxes. You also agree to the billing frequency stated at the time of your order. The Company reserves the right to change prices and fees at any time, however, we will notify you in advance if the regular rate of a Subscription changes from the price stated at the time of your order. If you do not wish to pay the new price, you may cancel your Subscription or purchase from that point forward. Applicable taxes may vary. We are not able to notify you in advance of changes in applicable taxes.
You acknowledge and agree that the Company reserves the right to charge a fee for any portion of the Services.  The Company will provide you with advance notice of any such fees, including any change in the amount of such fees, and a way to cancel your account and/or Subscription in the event you do not wish to pay the modified fee.  If you continue to use the Services after a fee has been imposed or increased, you are expressly agreeing to the fee or increase thereto, and you will be responsible for paying such fee for the balance of your Subscription or use of the Services.  If the Company suspends or terminates your account and/or access to the Services because you have breached this Agreement or violated Applicable Law, you will not be entitled to a refund of any unused portion of such fees or other payments.
If you subscribe to a paid Service or purchase a product made available through the Services, (each such purchase, a "
Transaction
"), you will be asked to provide certain information to complete such purchase, which may include your credit card number, the expiration date of your credit card, billing address, and shipping information.
YOU REPRESENT AND WARRANT THAT YOU HAVE THE LEGAL RIGHT TO USE ANY CREDIT CARD(S) OR OTHER PAYMENT METHOD(S) UTILIZED IN CONNECTION WITH ANY TRANSACTION
. You further agree to pay all charges that may be incurred by you or on your behalf through the Services, at the price(s) in effect when such charges are incurred including all shipping and handling charges and applicable taxes. Verification of information may be required prior to the acknowledgment or completion of any Transaction.
You are responsible for any taxes that may be applicable to your Transactions.  We may be required by law to collect sales or other taxes on orders shipped to certain jurisdictions and if your order is shipping to these jurisdictions, the appropriate charges will be added to your merchandise total and displayed on your final order confirmation. We reserve the right to collect such taxes in any other jurisdictions if we believe that such collection is required by law.
The prices displayed on the Services are quoted in U.S. dollars, unless otherwise indicated.  All orders placed through the Services are subject to our acceptance and we may refuse to accept or may cancel any order, whether or not the order has been confirmed, for any or no reason, and without liability to you or anyone else.
REFUND POLICY
If you wish to cancel your subscription, you will not be credited with a prorated refund. You will retain access until the end of your term and your subscription will not be auto-renewed.
NOTICES
You agree that any notices that the Company may be required by Applicable Laws to send to you will be effective upon either: (a) the Company's sending an e-mail message to the e-mail address you have on file with the Company; or (b) the Company publishing such notices on the Site.  You agree that all agreements, notices, disclosures, and other communications that we provide to you electronically satisfy any legal requirement that such communications be in writing.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The content, data, and/or materials that are included in, or referenced as part of, the Services are for informational and educational purposes only and should not be construed as a recommendation, solicitation, and/or rating to buy, hold, or sell any securities. All content presented, including third-party tools, data, and research, have been obtained or derived from sources believed to be accurate and reliable; however, the Company, its corporate affiliates, and business partners do not guarantee the accuracy, reliability, or suitability of any content presented and such information may be incomplete, condensed, outdated, or otherwise inaccurate. The historical performance of any securities, investment strategies, and/or products/services detailed or referenced herein should not be viewed as an indication or guarantee of any future success or performance.
Users should note that certain securities and/or investment strategies may not be suitable for all investors as they may involve substantial risk, be speculative, and/or involve material transaction costs to execute. Users must make their own investment decisions based upon individual investment objectives, financial positions, and tax considerations. The Company makes no representations or warranties regarding the advisability of investing in any particular securities or utilizing any specific investment strategies. There is no substitute for comprehensive analysis of a security prior to investment. Further, it should be noted that the Company and its corporate affiliates, and their respective shareholders, directors, members, officers, employees, agents, and/or other representatives may, from time to time, have long or short positions or may acquire direct or indirect beneficial interests in securities mentioned or not mentioned. Lastly, the content, data, and/or materials that are included in, or referenced as part of, the Services are subject to change at any time without notice.
DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES, TERMS, & LIABILITY
THE SERVICES, INCLUDING ANY CONTENT, DATA, AND/OR MATERIALS ACCESSIBLE ON THE SERVICES, ARE PROVIDED "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE" AND THERE MAY BE DELAYS, OMISSIONS, AND/OR INACCURACIES IN SUCH ITEMS. THE COMPANY INDEMNIFIED PARTIES (AS DEFINED BELOW) CANNOT AND DO NOT GUARANTEE THE ACCURACY, SEQUENCE, COMPLETENESS, TIMELINESS, MERCHANTABILITY, OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OF THE SERVICES AND/OR THE CONTENT, DATA, AND/OR MATERIALS MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SERVICES OR BY ANY FORCE MAJEURE OR ANY OTHER CAUSE BEYOND THEIR REASONABLE CONTROL AND HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY WARRANTY THEREFORE.
THE COMPANY INDEMNIFIED PARTIES SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANYONE ELSE FOR ANY LOSS OR INJURY CAUSED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY ITS NEGLIGENCE, OMISSION IN PROCURING, COMPILING, INTERPRETING, EDITING, WRITING, REPORTING, TRANSMITTING, OR DELIVERING ANY DATA THROUGH THE SERVICES OR FOR INTERRUPTION IN THE SERVICES. IN NO EVENT, WILL THE COMPANY INDEMNIFIED PARTIES BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANYONE ELSE FOR YOUR USE OF OR INABILITY TO USE THE SERVICES, THE SITE, ANY SITES LINKED TO OR FROM THE SERVICES, ANY DATA ON THE SERVICES, OR ANY DECISION MADE OR ACTION TAKEN BY YOU IN RELIANCE UPON SUCH INFORMATION OR DATA OR FOR ANY CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL OR SIMILAR DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOST PROFITS, TRADING LOSSES, DAMAGES RESULTING FROM INCONVENIENCE, OR LOSS OF USE OF THE SERVICE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. THIS SERVICE MAY BE DISCONTINUED OR LIMITED AT ANY TIME. THE FOREGOING DOES NOT AFFECT ANY LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT BE EXCLUDED OR LIMITED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.
The Company makes no warranties of any kind regarding any third-party sites or services ("
Third-Party Services
") to which you may be directed or linked to from the Services. Links are included solely for your convenience, and the Company makes no representations or warranties with regard to the accuracy, availability, suitability, or safety of information provided in such Third-Party Services. Inclusion of any Third-Party Service or a link thereto on the Services does not imply approval or endorsement by the Company of the Third-Party Service. When you engage with a provider of a Third-Party Service, you are interacting with the third-party, not with the Company. When you access Third-Party Services, you understand that you do so at your own risk. If you choose to use a Third-Party Service and share information with it, the provider of the Third-Party Service may use and share your data in accordance with its privacy policy and your privacy settings on such Third-Party Service.  You should not provide any personally identifiable information to or through any Third-Party Service unless you know and are comfortable with the party with whom you are interacting.  In addition, the provider of the Third-Party Service may use other parties to provide portions of the application or service to you, such as technology, development or payment services.
INDEMNIFICATION
You agree to indemnify and hold the Company, its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, licensors, advertisers and sponsors, agents, directors, officers, and employees and third-party information providers (collectively, the "
Company Indemnified Parties
") harmless from and against any and all Losses resulting or arising from any claim, action or proceeding brought by any third party in connection with or relating to your access to or use of the Services (or the use of the Services by another Person using your password) or violation of this Agreement.  "
Losses
" means any and all penalties, claims, actions, suits, costs, judgments, settlements, and expenses of whatever nature, whether incurred by or issued against an indemnified party or a third party, including: (a) indirect, special, punitive, consequential, or incidental losses or damages (including, but not limited to, trading losses, loss of anticipated profits, loss by reason of shutdown in operation or increased expenses of operation, or other indirect loss or damage); and (b) administrative costs, investigatory costs, litigation costs, expert costs, and auditors' and attorneys' and fees and disbursements (including in-house personnel).
ACCOUNT SECURITY
You agree to take all reasonable steps to protect the Services from unauthorized access or use. Upon registering, you will use your email address as a user name and choose a password that will permit you to access the Service(s), you must treat such information as confidential, and you must not disclose it to any other Person. You agree that you will be the sole User of the Services under your account. Your user name and password are subject to cancellation or suspension by the Company, including upon your misuse of the usernames or passwords in any way. You agree that you will use your best efforts to prevent any third party from obtaining your username and password, and you will immediately inform the Company of any actual or potential unauthorized access to a username or password or to the Services. You should use particular caution when accessing your account from a public or shared computer so that others are not able to view or record your username, password, or other personal information.
PROPRIETARY RIGHTS & PROTECTION
All of the data, information, content, materials, services, and software displayed on, transmitted through, or used in connection with the Services, including, for example, IBD Stock Checkup, IBD Charts, guides, news articles, opinions, reviews, text, photographs, images, illustrations, HTML, source and object code, software, Data (as defined below), etc., as well as its trade dress, layout, presentation, selection, and arrangement, are owned by the Company (collectively, the "
Content
"). The Company actively protects its rights to the Content to the fullest extent of the law. You may not use such Content except as provided in this Agreement.
You may use the Services, including any Content, online and solely for your personal, non-commercial use, and you may download or print a single copy of any portion of the Content for your personal, non-commercial use, provided that you do not remove any trademark, copyright, or other notice contained in such Content. No other use is permitted. You may not, for example, republish the Content on any Internet, Intranet, or Extranet site or incorporate the Content in any database, compilation, archive, or cache. You may not distribute any of the Content to others, whether or not for payment or other consideration, and, unless explicitly permitted on the Services, you may not modify, copy, frame, reproduce, sell, publish, transmit, display, download, share, or otherwise use any portion of the Content without the prior written consent of the Company. For information on requests to use the Content for any purpose other than as permitted in this paragraph, please contact the Company's Licensing Department at
askinvestorshelp.force.com/s
/. Any use of the Services not expressly permitted by this Agreement is a breach of this Agreement and may violate copyright, trademark, and/or other laws.
The Services contain data and other information including written words, instruments, charts, graphs, algorithms, ratings, rankings, products, vehicles, or devices (collectively, the "
Data
"). The Data may be generated by the Company or gathered by the Company from other sources. You acknowledge and agree that the Data are highly proprietary in nature and that unauthorized copying, transfer, or use may cause the Company or its affiliates, agents, information providers, and licensors irreparable injury that cannot be adequately compensated for by means of monetary damages. You agree that any breach of the Agreement may be enforced by the Company by means of equitable relief (including, but not limited to, injunctive relief) in addition to any other rights and remedies available to it. You may not frame or utilize framing techniques that involve any Content, trademark, logo, copyrighted material, or other proprietary information (including images, text, page layout, or form) of any portion of the Services without our express prior written consent.
DURATION & SURVIVAL
Even after your Subscription, account, or access to the Services is terminated by you or by the Company, this Agreement will remain in full force and effect with respect to your past and future use of the Services. Any rights to your account terminate upon your death. If any of the provisions of this Agreement, or application thereof to any Person or circumstance, shall to any extent be held invalid or unenforceable, the remainder of this Agreement, or the application of such terms or provisions to Persons or circumstances other than those as to which they are held invalid or unenforceable, shall not be affected thereby and each such term and provision of this Agreement shall be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.
CHANGES TO THE SERVICES OR THE AGREEMENT
The Company may, at any time, change or discontinue any aspect or feature of a Service, including Content, hours of availability, and equipment and software needed for access or use. We may update the Content, including, but not limited to, any Data on the Services from time to time, but Content is not necessarily complete or up-to-date. Any of the material on the Services may be out-of-date at any given time, and we are under no obligation to update such material.
You agree to be bound by future revisions of this Agreement. It is your responsibility to visit the "Terms of Use" link at the bottom of Investors.com homepage periodically to review the most current terms and conditions. The Company may also impose limits on certain features and services or restrict your access to parts or all of a Service without notice or liability. We reserve the right to withdraw or amend the Services, and any material we provide on the Services, in our sole discretion without notice. We will not be liable if for any reason all or any part of the Services are unavailable at any time or for any period. From time to time, we may restrict access to some or all parts of the Services to Users, including registered Users.
The Company may revise and update this Agreement from time to time in our sole discretion. All changes are effective immediately when we post them, and apply to all access to and use of the Services thereafter. Your continued use of any Service following the posting of a revised Agreement means that you accept and agree to the changes. You are expected to check this page from time to time so you are aware of any changes, as they are binding on you.
DISSEMINATION, DISCONTINUANCE, OR MODIFICATION
You understand that, at any time, the Company may discontinue disseminating any feature of the Services, including, but not limited to, any category of Data, may change or eliminate any transmission method, and may change transmission speeds, or other signal characteristics. You will not hold the Company liable for any resulting liability, loss, or damages that may arise therefrom. You acknowledge that the Company, in its sole discretion, may from time to time make modifications to its system(s), the Services, or Data.
USER CONTRIBUTIONS; ONLINE COMMUNITIES & FORUMS; RULES, POLICIES, & DISCLAIMERS
The Services may contain the ability to post content or messages or otherwise communicate with other users, including message boards, chat functionality, personal web pages or profiles, forums, and other interactive features that allow users to post, submit, publish, display, or transmit to other Users or other Persons (hereinafter, "
post
") content or materials (collectively, "
User Contributions
") on or through the Services.  Any User Contribution you post to the Services will be considered non-confidential and non-proprietary.
You understand and acknowledge that you are responsible for any User Contributions you submit or contribute, and you, not the Company, have full responsibility for such content, including its legality, reliability, accuracy, and appropriateness. We are not responsible, or liable to any third-party, for the content or accuracy of any User Contributions posted by you or any other user of the Services. User Contributions, including any messages in online communities or forums express the views of the author of the message, not necessarily the views of the Company or any entity affiliated with the Company. The Company does not make investment recommendations. Information posted by Users on online communities or forums should not be used as a substitute for independent research, and should not be relied on to trade or make investment decisions. Occasionally, a staff member may participate in online communities and forums and in such case, we will clearly identify the participant as a Company staff member.
The Company does not claim ownership of any User Contribution. However, by posting a User Contribution to the Services, you grant to the Company and our distributors a worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, non-exclusive, and fully transferable and sub-licensable right to use, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create derivative works from, distribute, and display User Contributions you post, in whole or in part, throughout the world for any purpose, including commercial and promotional purposes without additional compensation or consent.
REMOVAL OF POSTS & MESSAGES
Any User who feels that a posted message is objectionable is encouraged to contact Customer Success through:
askinvestorhelp.force.com/s/
. We have the ability to remove objectionable or violative messages and if it is determined that removal is necessary, we will make every effort to do so within a reasonable time frame. This is a manual process, however, so we may not be able to remove particular messages immediately.
COPYRIGHT INFRINGEMENT
If you are a copyright owner or an agent thereof and believe that any content on the Services infringes upon your copyright(s), you may submit a notification pursuant to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act ("
DMCA
") by providing our Designated Agent (as defined below) with the following information in writing: (a) a physical or electronic signature of a Person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is allegedly infringed; (b) identification of the copyrighted work claimed to have been infringed, or, if multiple copyrighted works on the Services are covered by a single notification, a representative list of such works on the Services; (c) identification of the material that is claimed to be infringing or to be the subject of infringing activity and that is to be removed or access to which is to be disabled and information reasonably sufficient to permit us to locate the material; (d) information reasonably sufficient to permit us to contact you, such as an address, telephone number, and, if applicable, an e-mail address; (e) a statement that you have a good faith belief that use of the material in the manner complained of is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law; and (f) a statement that the information in the notification is accurate, and under penalty of perjury, that you are authorized to act on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is allegedly infringed.
Written notification of claimed infringement must be submitted to the following Designated Agent
.
By mail:Dow Jones Copyright Agent
Dow Jones Legal Dept
Dow Jones & Company, Inc.
4300 North Route 1
South Brunswick, NJ 08852
Phone: (609) 520-4400
E-mail:
copyright@dowjones.com
For clarity, only DMCA notices should be sent to the Designated Agent. Any other feedback, comments, requests for technical support, and other communications should be directed to the Company's Customer Success Team at:
askinvestorhelp.force.com/s/
. You acknowledge and agree that if you fail to comply with all of the requirements of this section, your DMCA notice may not be valid.
If your content was removed (or access thereto was disabled) and you believe that such content is not infringing, or that you have the authorization from the copyright owner, the copyright owner's agent, or pursuant to Applicable Laws, to make such content available to us for use on the Services, you may send a counter-notice containing the following information to our Designated Agent: (a) your physical or electronic signature; (b) identification of the content that has been removed or to which access has been disabled and the location at which the content appeared before it was removed or disabled; (c) a statement that you have a good faith belief that the content was removed or disabled as a result of a mistake or a misidentification of the content; and (e) your name, address, telephone number, and, if applicable, e-mail address, and a statement that you shall accept service of process from the person who provided notification of the alleged infringement.
If a counter-notice is received by our Designated Agent, we may send a copy of the counter-notice to the original complaining party informing that person that it may replace the removed content or cease disabling it in ten (10) business days. Unless the copyright owner files an action seeking a court order against the content provider or the user, the removed content may be replaced, or access to it restored, in ten (10) to fourteen (14) business days or more after receipt of the counter-notice, at our sole discretion.
RESTRICTED ACTIVITIES
You represent and warrant that: (a) you own or control all rights in and to the User Contributions and have the right to grant the license granted above to us and our affiliates and service providers, and each of their and our respective licensees, successors, and assigns; and (b) you will not post any content or materials that:
Are false, inaccurate, or misleading;
Infringe on any third party's copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret or other proprietary rights or rights of publicity or privacy;
Violate any Applicable Laws;
Contain any materials which is defamatory, vulgar, hateful, obscene, profane, libelous, abusive, inflammatory, unlawfully threatening, or unlawfully harassing;
Contain advertisements, chain letters, pyramid schemes, commercial messages, auctions, or solicitations;
Contain any viruses, impose an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the technical infrastructure of the Services, and not use any data mining, robot, spider, worms, time bombs, crawler, cancelbots, Trojan horse, or any data gathering or extraction method or manual process that may damage, detrimentally interfere with, or intercept any system, data, or personal information;
Create liability for use or cause us to lose the services of our ISPs or other service providers;
Promote sexually explicit or pornographic material, violence, or discrimination based on race, sex, religion, nationality, disability, sexual orientation, age, or other protected classifications;
Violate the legal rights (including the rights of publicity and privacy) of others or contain any material that could give rise to any civil or criminal liability under Applicable Laws or that otherwise may be in conflict with this Agreement or the Privacy Policy;
Promote any illegal activity, or advocate, promote, or assist any unlawful act;
Cause annoyance, inconvenience, or needless anxiety or be likely to upset, embarrass, harass, alarm, or annoy any other Person;
Impersonate any Person, or misrepresent your identity or affiliation with any Person or organization or is otherwise intended or likely to deceive any Person;
Involves commercial activities or sales, such as contests, sweepstakes and other sales promotions, barter or advertising; or
Gives the impression that they emanate from or are endorsed by IBD or any other Person, if this is not the case.
DISCLAIMER FOR USER CONTRIBUTIONS
The Company and the Company Indemnified Parties and related companies are not responsible for the accuracy, errors, or omissions of any information posted as User Contributions, including any content or links included in such User Contributions, and are not responsible for any trading or investment decisions based on such information. The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission recognizes the growing possibility of cyberfraud. Please refer to
www.sec.gov/investor/pubs/cyberfraud.htm
for further information, or to the SEC's main website at
www.sec.gov
or the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. at
nasd.com
.
Any personal information you post in User Contributions becomes public information. You should exercise caution when deciding to disclose any personal information. The Company and the Company Indemnified Parties are not responsible for any events or damages arising from your disclosure of personal information in a User Contribution.  You are solely responsible for your interactions with other users of the Services, providers of any Third-Party Services, or any other Persons with whom you interact on, through or in connection with the Services. The Company reserves the right, but has no obligation, to become involved in any way with any disputes between you and such Persons.
Although the Company does not and cannot review all the messages posted and is not responsible for the content of any of these messages, the Company reserves the right to delete any message for any or no reason whatsoever, including but not limited to excessive use of copyrighted material, using the Services for commercial purposes, or excessive self-promotion. The Company reserves the right to determine what constitutes "excessive" related to message removal. We do not guarantee or warrant the accuracy, completeness, or usefulness of any message, and are not responsible for the contents of any message. You remain solely responsible for the content of your User Contributions, and you agree to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Company Indemnified Parties and all affiliates with respect to any claim based upon transmission of your User Contributions.
PRIVACY
Your use of the Services is also governed by the Company's Privacy Policy available at
investors.com/investors-business-daily-privacy-policy/
. The Company does not knowingly allow access to or collect information from children under the age of eighteen (18). If you are not over the age of eighteen (18), please do not use the Services.
ARBITRATION & CLASS ACTION WAIVER AGREEMENT
The Company (including the Company Indemnified Parties and their affiliates, agents, employees, predecessors in interest, successors, and assigns) and you agree that any Dispute (as defined below) between you and the Company or the Company Indemnified Parties, regarding any aspect of your relationship with the Company, will be resolved in a binding, confidential, individual, and fair arbitration process, and not in court. EACH OF YOU AND THE COMPANY AGREES TO GIVE UP THE RIGHT TO SUE IN COURT AND TO A TRIAL BY JURY.
The term "
Dispute
" is to be given the broadest possible meaning that will be enforced, and shall include any dispute, claim, demand, count, cause of action, or controversy between you and the Company, whether based in contract, statute, regulation, ordinance, tort (including, but not limited to, fraud, misrepresentation, fraudulent inducement, negligence, or any other intentional tort), or any other legal or equitable theory.  The term "Dispute" specifically includes, but is not limited to, any and all claims between you and the Company in any way related to or concerning this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement, any other aspect of this Agreement (including their applicability and their conformance to Applicable Laws), any products or services provided by the Company, any billing disputes, handling of your personal information, and any disputes relating to telephonic, text message, or any other communications either of us received from the other.
The only exceptions to this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement are that: (i) each of you and Company retains the right to sue in small claims court; and (ii) each of you and the Company may bring suit in court against the other to enjoin infringement or other misuse of intellectual property rights.  Disputes over whether these exceptions apply shall be resolved by the court in which such action has been brought; all other disputes over arbitrability shall be resolved by the arbitrator. EACH OF YOU AND THE COMPANY ALSO AGREES TO GIVE UP THE ABILITY TO SEEK TO REPRESENT, IN A CLASS ACTION OR OTHERWISE, ANYONE BUT EACH OF YOU AND COMPANY (SEE PARAGRAPH 6 BELOW). There is no judge or jury in arbitration, and court review of an arbitration award is limited.  An arbitrator must follow this Agreement.  The arbitrator, however, can award on an individual basis the same damages and relief as a court (including injunctive and declaratory relief, or statutory damages).
This Agreement evidences a transaction in interstate commerce, and thus the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C. §§ 1-16, governs the interpretation and enforcement of this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement.  This Arbitration Agreement shall survive termination of this Agreement.
Any arbitration between you and the Company will be conducted by Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services, Inc. ("
JAMS
"), pursuant to the JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules & Procedures effective as of July 1, 2014 (the "
JAMS Rules
"), as modified by this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement. The arbitration shall be conducted by a single, neutral arbitrator, and if you and the Company cannot agree on who that single arbitrator will be, the arbitrator will be appointed pursuant to the JAMS Rules, with the participation and involvement of the Company and you pursuant to JAMS Rule 12. The JAMS Rules and Consumer Arbitration Minimum Standards are available on JAMS' website at
com/consumer-minimum-standards
.
The arbitrator is bound by the terms of this Agreement. Additionally, demands for arbitration must be in writing and within the applicable statute of limitations. If either you or the Company wants to arbitrate a claim, you or Company must first send by mail to the other a written Notice of Dispute ("
Notice
") that sets forth the name, address, and contact information of the party giving notice, the specific facts giving rise to the Dispute, the Service to which the Notice relates, and the relief requested.  Your Notice to the Company must be sent by mail to:
Dow J
on
es & Company, I
N
C 1211 Avenue
o
f
t
he Amer
ic
as, N
e
w Y
o
rk, NY 10036, ATTN: Legal
D
e
p
ar
t
m
e
nt
, Investor's Business Daily. The Company will send any Notice to you at the contact information we have for you or that you provide. It is the sender's responsibility to ensure that the recipient receives the Notice. During the first forty-five (45) days after you or we send a Notice to the other, you and we may try to reach a settlement of the Dispute.
If you and we do not resolve the Dispute within forty-five (45) days, either you or we may initiate arbitration in accordance with the JAMS Rules. Further instructions on submitting a Demand for Arbitration may be found at:
www.jamsadr.com/consumer-minimum-standards
.  In addition to filing this Demand for Arbitration with JAMS in accordance with its rules and procedures, you must send a copy of this completed Demand for Arbitration to the Company at the address listed above to which you sent your Notice of Dispute. All communications between you and the Company (and/or our representatives) in connection with the attempted resolution of any Dispute shall be deemed to have been delivered in furtherance of a Dispute settlement and shall be exempt from discovery and production, and not admissible as evidence, in any subsequent proceeding related to the resolution of the Dispute.
You and IBD acknowledge and agree to abide by the following rules for arbitration: (a) YOU AND THE COMPANY MAY BRING CLAIMS AGAINST THE OTHER ONLY IN YOUR OR ITS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS, REPRESENTATIVE, OR MULTI-CLAIMANT PROCEEDING, AND THE ARBITRATOR SHALL HAVE NO POWER TO AWARD CLASS-WIDE RELIEF; (b) the Company will pay arbitration costs as required by the JAMS Consumer Arbitration Minimum Standards and consistent with paragraph 6 below; (c) the arbitrator may award any individual relief or individual remedies that are permitted by Applicable Laws; and (d) each side pays his, her or its own attorneys' fees, except as otherwise provided in paragraph 5 below.
JAMS charges filing and other fees to conduct arbitrations. Ordinarily, the claimant has to pay the filing fee to initiate arbitration, but if you wish to commence an arbitration against the Company, you and the Company acknowledge and agree to abide by the following: (a) if you are seeking to recover less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000 USD) (inclusive of attorneys' fees), the Company will pay the filing fee on your behalf or reimburse your payment of it; (b) if you are seeking to recover ten thousand dollars ($10,000 USD) or more, you will have to pay the filing fee charged by JAMS, but the Company will reimburse the filing fee if you prevail on all claims decided upon by the arbitrator; (c) you and the Company agree that, if the claims to be arbitrated total less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000 USD) (inclusive of attorneys' fees), the claim ordinarily should be decided on written submissions only, without a telephonic or in-person hearing; the Company will not request a hearing for any claims totaling less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000 USD) - this provision shall not be construed by the arbitrator to deprive you of any rights you may have to a telephonic or in-person hearing in your hometown area pursuant to the JAMS Rules; and (d) you and the Company agree that, if the claims to be arbitrated total ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, the arbitration will occur in a manner and place consistent with the JAMS Rules.
Regardless of how the arbitration proceeds, each of you and the Company shall cooperate in good faith in the exchange of non-privileged documents and information as necessary in accordance with the JAMS Rules, and the arbitrator shall issue a reasoned written decision sufficient to explain his or her findings and conclusions.
Each of you and the Company may incur attorneys' fees during the arbitration. Each side agrees to pay his, her, or its own attorneys' fees unless the claim(s) at issue permit the prevailing party to be paid its attorneys' fees, and in such instance, the fees awarded shall be determined by Applicable Law. In addition to whatever rights you may have to recover your attorneys' fees under Applicable Law, if you prevail in the arbitration, and if the Company failed to make a settlement offer to you before the arbitration or the amount you win is at least twenty-five percent (25%) greater than the Company's highest settlement offer, then the Company will pay your reasonable attorneys' fees in addition to the amount the arbitrator awarded. If the Company wins the arbitration, you will be responsible for your own attorneys' fees.  In addition, if the arbitrator, at the request of the winning party, finds that the losing party brought a claim or asserted a defense frivolously or for an improper purpose, then regardless of the amount in dispute, the arbitrator must order the losing party to pay both sides' arbitration fees and may order the losing party to pay the winning party's reasonable attorneys' fees, unless such an award of fees is prohibited by Applicable Law.
The arbitrator may award declaratory or injunctive relief only in favor of the individual party seeking relief and only to the extent necessary to provide relief warranted by that party's individual claim. The arbitrator may not order the Company to pay any monies to or take any actions with respect to persons other than you, unless the Company explicitly consents in advance, after an arbitrator is selected, to permit the arbitrator to enter such an order. Further, unless the Company expressly agrees, the arbitrator may not consolidate other persons' claims with yours, and may not otherwise preside over any form of a representative, multi-claimant, or class proceeding.
You and the Company agree to maintain the confidential nature of the arbitration proceeding and shall not disclose the fact of the arbitration, any documents exchanged as part of any mediation, proceedings of the arbitration, the arbitrator's decision, and the existence or amount of any award, except as may be necessary to prepare for or conduct the arbitration (in which case anyone becoming privy to confidential information must undertake to preserve its confidentiality), or except as may be necessary in connection with a court application for a provisional remedy, a judicial challenge to an award, or its enforcement, or unless otherwise required by law or court order.
With the exception of subpart (a) in paragraph (3) of this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement (i.e., the waiver of the ability to proceed on behalf of multiple claimants or a purported class), if any part of this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement is deemed invalid, unenforceable, or illegal, then the balance of this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement shall remain in effect and be construed in accordance with its terms as if the invalid, unenforceable, or illegal provision were not contained. If, however, subpart (a) in paragraph (3) of this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement is found invalid, unenforceable, or illegal, then the entirety of this Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement shall be null and void, but the rest of this Agreement including the provisions governing where actions against the Company must be pursued, the choice of governing law, and our mutual waiver of the right to a trial by jury, will remain in effect and apply to any claim that, for this or any other reason, proceeds in court rather than in arbitration.
GOVERNING LAW & JURISDICTION
Use of the Services, including any Transactions on or through the Services, and any controversy, claim, or dispute arising out of or relating in any way to your use of the Services, this Agreement, and/or products purchased through the Services shall be governed by the laws of your home state of residence without respect to its choice (or conflict) of laws rules.  Any claim or cause of action you may have with respect to the Company or the Services must be commenced within one (1) year after the claim or cause of action arose. Jurisdiction and venue for any dispute shall be in Los Angeles, California. Each party submits to personal jurisdiction and venue in that forum for any and all purposes.
CLASS ACTION WAIVER
BOTH YOU AND THE COMPANY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO BRING ANY CONTROVERSY, CLAIM, OR DISPUTE ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING IN ANY WAY TO YOUR USE OF THE SERVICES OR PURCHASES THROUGH THE SERVICES AS A CLASS, CONSOLIDATED, REPRESENTATIVE, COLLECTIVE, OR PRIVATE ATTORNEY GENERAL ACTION, OR TO PARTICIPATE IN A CLASS, CONSOLIDATED, REPRESENTATIVE, COLLECTIVE, OR PRIVATE ATTORNEY GENERAL ACTION REGARDING ANY SUCH CLAIM BROUGHT BY ANYONE ELSE.
ENTIRE AGREEMENT
This Agreement, the Privacy Policy, the Arbitration & Class Action Waiver Agreement, any supplemental terms, applicable Third-Party Terms (as defined below) and any other required documents for use of the Services, constitute the sole and entire agreement between you and the Company with respect to the Services and supersede all prior and contemporaneous understandings, agreements, representations, and warranties (both written and oral) with respect to the Services.
FEEDBACK, COMMENTS, & CONCERNS
All feedback, comments, concerns, requests for technical support, and other communications relating to the Services should be directed to
askinvestorhelp.force.com/s/
. For any ideas, suggestions, recommendations, requests, or other feedback that you provide to the Company (collectively, "
Feedback
") you grant the Company a perpetual, irrevocable, transferable, worldwide, fully-paid, royalty-free license to create derivative works and fully use and exploit such Feedback without any obligation to you (monetary or otherwise).
TRADEMARK & COPYRIGHT OWNERSHIP NOTICE
The Services contain proprietary, original content that is protected by U.S. copyright and international treaties. The Company retains all intellectual property rights. The Company will pursue legal action against anyone who misappropriates its name, trademarks, or content. This notice constitutes fair warning. All trademarks used herein are the exclusive property of their respective trademark owners and may not be used in any way without written consent of their owner. Without limiting the foregoing, the following notices will apply to the Services:
IBD, IBD Digital, IBD Live, IBD Sector Leaders, IBD TV, IBD Weekly, Investor's Business Daily, LeaderBoard, SmartSelect and Stock Checkup.
© 2024 Investor's Business Daily, LLC
Sub-policy 5
https://www.ftc.gov/enforcement/rules/rulemaking-regulatory-reform-proceedings/childrens-online-privacy-protection-rule:

Sub-policy 6
https://www.investors.com/investors-business-daily-privacy-policy:
INVESTOR'S BUSINESS DAILY PRIVACY NOTICE
Last Updated December 24, 2024
This Privacy Notice explains how Investor's Business Daily, LLC (the "Company", "we", "our", or "us") collects, uses, and discloses personal information about you when you use our website investors.com (the "
Site
"), mobile applications (apps), and/or other products or services that refer to this Privacy Notice, attend our conferences or events, receive our newsletters or emails, or participate in a survey or study (collectively, the "
Services
").
Please read this Privacy Notice carefully before you start to use the Services.
BY ACCESSING OR USING THE SERVICES, YOU ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU HAVE READ AND ACCEPT THIS PRIVACY NOTICE.
If you do not want to agree to this Privacy Notice, you must not access or use the Services.
The Services are intended for general audiences. In accordance with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), we do not knowingly collect personal information from minors under 13 years of age.
1. WHAT TYPES OF INFORMATION MIGHT WE COLLECT & HOW DO WE COLLECT IT?
1.1 INFORMATION YOU PROVIDE TO US
When you engage with the Services, we may collect personal information you provide to us.  This information may include:
contact or identifier data (e.g., name, email address, billing and shipping address, username/alias, or telephone number), when you sign up for or engage with the Services;
transactional or financial information (e.g., credit card or debit card number or related payment information in connection with a purchase of the Services);
information you provide when you register for an event or conference (e.g., your occupation or interests);
user-generated content when you participate in a community forum or otherwise post content that others can read or view (e.g., your comments, username, or profile picture);
information you provide when you create a profile, participate in a sweepstakes, contest, or game, or participate in a survey or study (e.g., your education, interests, preferences, age range, household income level, or gender);
information you provide when you use an interactive feature (e.g., text, chat, chat bot, or article sharing options);
customer service information, such as messages and other information you address to us through online forms, text, chat, by email, over the phone, or by postal mail; and
personal data you provide to us about your friends and associates, such as names and email addresses (e.g., when you purchase a gift subscription for their benefit). This is only available in the U.S. If you provide us with such information, you acknowledge and agree that those individuals reside in the United States and you have their consent to provide their contact information to us.
1.2 INFORMATION FROM OTHER SOURCES
We may obtain personal information about you in connection with the Services from our affiliates (e.g., when you purchase or use our Services bundled with the products or services offered by our affiliates), service providers, business partners and other third parties (such as social networking services with which you engage, or, if applicable to you, the third party provider of your subscription (e.g., your employer or educational institution)), or publicly or commercially available sources. Such information may include:
transactional information in connection with your purchase of the Services (e.g., purchase information and history);
commercial information, such as other products or services you have purchased, obtained, or considered;
demographic data, such as gender, age range, educational level, or household income range;
professional or employment-related data, such as occupation/job title and industry;
preferences and shopping interests;
geolocation data; and
your activities on Internet sites or mobile apps, such as information about content, products, services, or advertisements you have seen or interacted with, including content, products, or services of our advertisers.
If you log in with or connect a third-party social networking service (e.g., Facebook, X (formerly known as Twitter), Instagram) with a Service, or share our content via a third-party social networking service (e.g., Facebook, X, Instagram), we may obtain information about you, such as your user ID and/or username and other data you have permitted those third-party services to share with us consistent with your privacy settings on the applicable third-party service. When you access the Services through social networking services or when you connect the Services to social networking services, you are authorizing us to collect, store, disclose, and use such information and content in accordance with this Privacy Notice.
1.3 INFORMATION COLLECTED BY AUTOMATED MEANS THROUGH OUR SERVICES
We may collect certain information through automated means (such as cookies, web beacons, web server logs, pixels, and other similar technologies) through your use of the Services. Such information may include:
your device information (such as unique identifier and connection information, including mobile device advertising IDs (e.g., Apple IDFA or Google AAID), and means of connection (e.g., WiFi connection, ISP));
your device type and settings, mobile number and carrier details, software used, browser type and version, operating system and platform;
IP address;
language preferences;
viewing behavior (including the content you view and duration);
links you click on within, and search queries you run on, the Services (e.g., clickstream);
usage data, including websites or other services you visited before visiting the Services (referring URL), access times and other details about your use and interactions on our Services, and when you click on a URL that directs you to the Site or open an email communication that we send to you; and
location information (including city and state associated with a unique identifier).
For more information on the various types of automated means we use to gather information, please see the section titled "
Information about Cookies
" below.
2. HOW DO WE USE YOUR INFORMATION?
The Company, or our service providers acting on our behalf, may use personal information collected from and about you for the purposes set forth below:
2.1 TO PROVIDE AND MANAGE THE SERVICES
This may include to:
provide the Services (including to process and fulfill your subscription, complete a transaction that you requested, or provide you with information about your account or the Services, including communications about purchases or changes to our terms, conditions, or policies);
create and manage online accounts (including to enable you to sign in to our affiliates' sites and apps, as appropriate, through a single sign-on);
provide customer support (including via online chat or chatbot);
provide technical support;
deliver relevant content and suggestions (e.g., if you use multiple products, we may use your reading history or activity to personalize the content delivered to you across products);
conduct market research if you choose to participate in surveys or research studies;
communicate about, and administer participation in, sweepstakes, contests, promotions, special events, or rewards programs; and
send you promotional materials, offers, and product or service information, events, and other communications, including via text/SMS messages if you provide your mobile phone number and opt in to receive such text/SMS messages ("Text Messages"). Your consent to receive Text Messages is not required to purchase goods or services from us.
2.2 TO MEASURE AND IMPROVE OUR PRODUCTS AND SERVICES/CONDUCT ANALYSIS
This may include to:
operate, evaluate, and improve our business (including developing, enhancing, analyzing and improving our Services; recording and troubleshooting any difficulties you have with the Services; managing our communications; performing data and statistical analytics (including measuring user experiences); and performing accounting, auditing, and other internal functions); and
monitor and analyze the extent of your use of the Services, including your purchases, to inform modifications, enhancements or updates to the Services, or make marketing or pricing decisions.
2.3 TO ALLOW YOU TO SHARE USER-GENERATED CONTENT
Certain features on the Services give you an opportunity to interact with us and others. These features include collaboration tools, community forums, chats, creating community profiles, rating, tagging, and commenting on content. If you choose to use these features, any information you choose to share (such as your name, user name, email address, picture or image, likes, status, or comments) becomes public and can be used for purposes over which we have no control. We are not responsible for any information you choose to submit and make public through these features.
If you choose to submit suggestions, ideas, enhancement requests, recommendations, or other feedback in connection with the Services (collectively, "Feedback"), the Company may use such Feedback to improve the Services or its business.  You will not receive any compensation for any such Feedback.
2.4 TO DELIVER INTEREST-BASED ADVERTISING (
aka
Targeted Advertising)
As described in this Privacy Notice, we, as well as our third-party service providers, may obtain information about your online activity to provide you with advertising about products and services tailored to your individual interests.  We also engage third party online advertising companies, advertisers and ad networks to help target our messaging to visitors through interest-based and contextual means. These third parties may collect information about your activities on the Site and other websites or apps. These third party ad networks may use this information to show you advertisements on the Services or other third-party websites and apps that may be tailored to your individual interests. This information also helps us track the effectiveness of our marketing efforts.
To the extent required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent before using your information for interest-based advertising. To learn how to opt out of online interest-based advertising (or, as it may be called in some jurisdictions, targeted advertising), please follow the instructions in the section titled "
Your Choices and Rights
", below.
2.5 TO PROTECT THE RIGHTS OF THE COMPANY AND OTHERS
The Company may use your personal information as we believe to be necessary or appropriate in order to detect, identify, investigate, protect against, and prevent fraud and other unlawful activity, claims, and other liabilities; secure, protect and defend the privacy, safety, or property of the Company and the Services, and the Company's affiliates, employees, agents, and users; comply with and enforce legal requirements, including laws outside of your country of residence, relevant industry standards, contractual obligations, and our terms of use and other policies; and respond to inquiries from third parties, including inquiries from law enforcement authorities.
2.6 AGGREGATED DATA
The Company may anonymize or de-identify personal information to provide our affiliates and third parties with aggregated data reports showing anonymized information and other non-personal information.
3. WITH WHOM AND FOR WHAT PURPOSE DOES THE COMPANY DISCLOSE OR SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
3.1 OUR AFFILIATES
We may share your personal information with our affiliates for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice, including to support the provision of the Services to you and for each company's marketing purposes (with your consent if required by applicable law). A list of the Company's affiliates is available in annual reports accessible
here
. Users who visit our affiliates' sites or receive our affiliates' services should still refer to their separate privacy policies, which may differ in some respects from this Privacy Notice.
In addition, as the Company is part of a larger group of companies, it may be necessary for the Company to share personal information so that such affiliates may carry out their legal, regulatory or contractual responsibilities or coordinate or implement business plans, logistics or operations, including to enable you to sign in to our affiliates' sites and apps, as appropriate, through a single sign-on; to help detect, investigate and prevent fraud or other illegal activity; monitor users' access to our network for the purpose of maintaining network security and preventing cyber-attacks, unauthorized access, inappropriate use of data, corporate espionage, hacking and system breaches; and protect and defend the rights, interests and safety of the Services, our affiliates, and our and their employees, contractors, agents and customers.
3.2 OUR SUBSCRIPTION/ACCESS PROVIDERS
If your subscription or other access is provided in whole or in part by your employer, educational institution or other third party, we may share with them information about your access to and use of your subscription or other product or service, including for access through educational institutions, your name and email address.
3.3 OUR SERVICE PROVIDERS
We may share your personal information with our service providers that provide services to us or to you on our behalf (including to process payments, fulfill orders or deliver subscriptions; send email or Text Messages on our behalf, analyze, measure, and improve the Services); and allow for the backup and protection of your information (e.g., utilizing cloud-based services to archive/protect data). We do not share your personal data obtained through Text Messages with third parties for their marketing purposes.
3.4 OUR BUSINESS PARTNERS
We may share your data with our business partners to provide you with sponsored (or co-sponsored) services or programs that you participate in, such as conferences, events, contests, sweepstakes or other promotions ("Sponsored Services"). These Sponsored Services may be hosted by the Site or on a third party business partner's site or service. The business partner's use of your information will be governed by its privacy notice.
3.5 TO PROTECT OUR SERVICES AND USERS
We may disclose information to protect and defend the rights, interests and safety of the Site and the Services, our affiliates, and our and their employees, contractors and agents; and to protect the security and safety of our users of the Site and other Services, including when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss.
3.6 LAW ENFORCEMENT OR OTHER GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS OR OTHER THIRD PARTIES TO COMPLY WITH LEGAL REQUIREMENTS
We may disclose personal information to law enforcement authorities or other government officials, or otherwise to comply with our legal requirements: if we are required to do so to comply with subpoenas, court orders, legal process or other law enforcement or other government measures, and to comply with other legal obligations; to protect and defend the rights, interests, and safety of the Services and our users, our affiliates and our and their employees, contractors, and agents; and to protect the security of our Services (including when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss). We may also disclose information if we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual fraud or illegal activity.
3.7 SOCIAL NETWORKING SERVICES
We may share your information when you log into or connect the Services with a social media service account. The Services may also offer you the ability to share information to a social networking site (e.g. Facebook, X, Instagram), by using integrated tools (e.g, the Facebook "Like" button). To control this sharing of information, please review and adjust your privacy settings for the relevant social network. The social networking service's use of the shared information will be governed by its privacy notice. See also our "
Social Networking Services Notice
".
3.8 THIRD PARTY TO COMPLETE A CORPORATE TRANSACTION
We may disclose personal information to a third party (and/or its advisors) in the event we sell or transfer all or part of our business or assets (including in the event of a merger, reorganization, dissolution, or liquidation) to such third party, or engage in discussions to do so.
4. HOW DOES THE COMPANY PROTECT MY INFORMATION?
4.1 SECURITY MEASURES AND SAFEGUARDS
The Company uses a combination of administrative, technical, organizational and physical measures to safeguard personal information in our possession against accidental, unlawful, or unauthorized loss, theft, use, disclosure, or modification. We make reasonable efforts to ensure a level of security appropriate to the risk of the processing, taking into account the costs of implementation and nature of the processing of personal information. However, no data transmission or storage, or use of the Internet, can be guaranteed to be 100% secure. If you think your interaction with us is no longer secure, please immediately notify us of the problem by contacting us as provided in the "
Company Contact Information
" section below.
5. YOUR CHOICES AND RIGHTS
We offer you many choices and you may have certain rights in connection with the personal information we collect about you.
5.1 YOUR CHOICES
5.1.1 EMAIL COMMUNICATIONS
You may ask us to remove your information from our marketing mailing lists by changing your account settings through the appropriate link on the Site's account settings page. You may also unsubscribe from our marketing mailing lists by following the "Unsubscribe" link at the bottom of each email.  However, even if you unsubscribe from our marketing communications, we may still need to send you communications related to your use of the Services and account-related information.
5.1.2 PUSH NOTIFICATIONS AND TEXT MESSAGES
If you have installed a mobile app and you wish to stop receiving push notifications, you can change the settings either on your mobile device or through the app.  You can opt out of Text Message alerts at any time by following the instructions in the Text Message you receive.
5.1.3 BROWSER CONTROLS
You have choices about whether cookies or similar technologies are placed on your computer or mobile device.  For more information, please see the section titled "
Information about Cookies
" below.
You may also choose to opt out of our use of your personal information that we or our third-party partners collect about your activities to provide you with tailored advertising about products or services of interest to you.  To learn more about how to opt out of such interest-based advertising, please see the section titled "
Information about Cookies
" or visit the consumer opt-out pages at
DAA
or
NAI
.
5.1.4 MOBILE APP PRIVACY SETTINGS
You may change the privacy settings for our mobile apps by accessing and updating privacy settings and permissions within the mobile app or on your mobile device.
5.2 YOUR RIGHTS
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights to access, review, update, correct inaccuracies in, and/or delete your personal information in our custody and control, which you may seek to exercise, by submitting a request
here
or by contacting us as specified in the "
Company Contact Information
" section below.
For security purposes, we will seek to verify your identity – in part by requesting certain information from you – as part of our process.  For instance, you may need to provide your name and email address.  For certain types of requests, we may also need to ask you for additional information to verify your identity.  Once we have verified your identity, we will respond to your request as appropriate.
5.2.1 THE RIGHT TO ACCESS AND RECTIFICATION OR CORRECTION
You may have the right to access, correct or update your personal information. Additionally, online subscribers and registered users may access their personal information online by signing into their accounts and visiting the appropriate account management sections of our websites. Please note that if you have subscribed or registered for more than one of our Services, you may need to update your information for each separately.
Where you have provided your consent for our use of your personal information, you have the right to withdraw your consent and we will apply your preferences going forward.
5.2.2 THE RIGHT TO DELETION
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to request that we delete your personal information. If you wish to delete the personal information we hold about you, please let us know and we will take reasonable steps to respond to your request in accordance with applicable legal requirements.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.  We may also need to retain certain types of information so that we can provide the Services to you.  If you ask us to delete your personal information, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
5.3 CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
For additional information for residents of the State of California, please click
here
.
5.4 OTHER U.S. STATES PRIVACY RIGHTS
For additional information for residents of
other states
that provide their residents with certain rights with respect to personal data, please click
here
.
5.5 FOR RESIDENTS OF THE UNITED KINGDOM OR THE EUROPEAN UNION/EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA
For additional information for residents of the United Kingdom or a country that is a member state within the European Union/European Economic Area, please click
here
.
6. LINKS TO AFFILIATES AND THIRD-PARTY SITES OR APPS
The Services may also be linked to sites or apps operated by third parties (including our affiliates), and may carry advertisements or offer content, special offers, functionality, games or applications developed and maintained by third parties, using iframes, tools, or plug-ins ("
Linked Services
"). These Linked Services may use automated means to collect information about you and your use of these features. Some of these Linked Services may be co-branded with our logo, even though they are not operated or maintained by us.
Linked Services are not owned or controlled by us and are not subject to the terms of this Privacy Notice.
We do not control third-party technologies or services and your use of such Linked Services is governed by the privacy notices of such third parties. Such third party's use of any information you share is governed by the third party's privacy notice. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of any other website or service. If you choose to visit those websites or use their services, you do so at your own risk.
7. INFORMATION ABOUT COOKIES
The Company, and our service providers, may collect information by automated means when you visit, access, or use the Services that link to this Privacy Notice. We may collect information through cookies, web beacons, pixels, server calls, server logs, JavaScript, and other tracking technologies (collectively, "Cookies") to deliver and improve the Services, and to display relevant content, products, services and advertising.  Our use of Cookies may involve the processing of personal information (i.e., any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual, such as IP addresses, or other online mobile identifiers).
7.1 WHAT ARE COOKIES?
A cookie is a small text file that is sent to and stored on your computer, mobile device, or other internet-connected device, to identify your browser or store information. JavaScript, server calls or server logs allow us to use invisible images or code on the Services, or data from our server calls or server logs, to gain analytics insights.  A web beacon links web pages to servers and may be used to transmit information collected through Cookies back to a web server.
7.2 COOKIES WE USE
Strictly Necessary Cookies
These cookies are essential to allow the Services to function effectively. They facilitate our authentication, registration or  log-in process and enable you to navigate and use the features of the Services.  Without these cookies, the performance of the Services may be affected and you may not be able to take advantage of the Services or their features. Strictly necessary cookies may include user session identifiers, device identifiers, demographic information, log-in identifiers and other information that is necessary, for instance, to authenticate users on multiple sites.
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies collect information about your choices and preferences (such as your user name or location) to provide enhanced and more personalized content and features (such as customizing a certain webpage or remembering if we have asked you to participate in a promotion) and for other Services you request, like watching a video or commenting on a blog.  In order to permit your connection to the Services, we receive and record information about your computer, device, and browser, potentially including your IP address, browser type, and other software or hardware information. If you access the Services from a mobile or other device, we may collect a unique device identifier assigned to that device ("UDID"), geolocation data obtained with your consent where required by applicable law, or other traffic information for that device. All of these features help us, for example, improve your visit to the Services.
Analytics Cookies
We and our service providers may use analytics cookies (or performance cookies) to collect information about your use of the Services to help create reports and statistics on the performance of the Services which enable us to improve the way they work.  Analytics cookies collect information such as your IP address, type of device, operating system, referring URLs, language preferences, date and time of page visits and page visited.  The information allows us to see overall patterns of usage on the Services, help us record any difficulties you have with the Services and show us whether our advertising is effective or not.  Analytics cookies on the Services may include Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics.  You can use the Google Analytics Opt-Out Browser Add-on available at:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
to disable tracking by Google Analytics. You may opt out of the tracking and analysis of your usage and browsing patterns by  Adobe Analytics, by clicking
here
.
Advertising Cookies
We and our service providers may use advertising cookies to deliver ads that we believe are relevant to you and your interests. For example, we may use advertising cookies to customize the advertising and content you receive on the Services, to conduct interest-based advertising (aka targeted advertising), to limit the number of times you see the same ad on the Services, to help measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns, and to conduct market research.  These cookies remember what you have looked at or purchased on the Services and other sites, and may be combined with other information acquired from third parties, such as demographics, and we may share this information with other organizations, such as advertisers or third parties, in accordance with applicable law.
The Company follows the Digital Advertising Alliance's Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising ("
OBA
") located
here
.
How You Can Manage Cookies
It is possible to disable the placement of Cookies through your browser settings.  Most browsers will tell you how to change your browser settings to notify you when a Cookie is being set or updated, or to restrict or block certain types or all Cookies. Please consult the "Help" section of your browser for more information or by visiting
www.allaboutcookies.org
. Your device settings may also allow you to prohibit mobile app platforms (such as Apple or Google) from sharing certain information obtained by automated means with us.
For information on how to opt-out of targeted advertising or Advertising Cookies, please take the following actions:
If you are a resident of the
specified U.S. states
, please go to the homepage of the Site and click on the "Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information" link in the footer of the Site or in the profile or settings page of the app.
All other U.S. state residents, click
DAA
or
NAI
.
Click
https://youradchoices.ca/en/tools
in Canada.
Note that opting out of advertising cookies is a device-based action, and it will not remove advertising from the pages you visit; instead, it means that the ads you see may not be matched to your interests.
If you make updates to your browser or device settings, or use an online link to opt out of Cookies, those updates apply to the device where you made the changes.  Please note that by disabling or blocking any or all Cookies, some features of the Services may not operate as intended, or you may not have access to features or personalization available through the Services.
In Europe and the United Kingdom, we participate in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and comply with its Specifications and Policies.  We use the Consent Management Platform with the identification number six.
8. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 TRANSFERS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Your personal information may be stored, transferred to, and processed in any country where we have operations or in which we engage service providers. These countries may be outside your country of residence, including the United States, and may have different data protection laws than in the country in which you initially provided the data. Applicable laws in the United States and/or other countries may allow the courts, law enforcement and national security authorities to access your personal information when in such country.
If you are a user located outside the United States or the country to which your information may be transferred, you understand (and, as permitted under applicable law, consent to) having any personal information processed in the United States or such country. When we transfer your data, we will protect that data as described in this Privacy Notice.
8.2 COLLECTION OF PERSONAL FINANCIAL INFORMATION BY A PAYMENT SERVICE
In some cases, we may use an unaffiliated payment service to allow you to purchase a product or service or make payments ("Payment Service"). If you wish to purchase a product or service or make a payment, in such a case, you may be directed to a Payment Service webpage. Any information that you provide to a Payment Service will be subject to the applicable Payment Service's privacy notice, rather than this Privacy Notice. We have no control over, and are not responsible for, any Payment Service's use of information collected through any Payment Service.
8.3 DO NOT TRACK SIGNALS
Some browsers or other tools include "Do Not Track" (DNT) features which, when turned on, send a signal to websites you visit indicating you do not wish to be tracked across websites over time. However, since no technology standard for DNT signals has been developed or adopted to date, the Services do not currently respond to DNT signals.
9. CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY NOTICE & COMMUNICATING CHANGES
From time to time, we may change our Privacy Notice to reflect changes to our privacy practice and services. If we modify the Privacy Notice, we will update the Effective Date and the changes will become effective as of the date we post such Notice. We will notify you of any material changes by posting a prominent notice on our Services indicating that we have updated this Privacy Notice or by other appropriate means, such as email through the email address you most recently provided to us. We encourage you to review our Privacy Notice periodically to ensure that you remain informed of changes that may have occurred.
10. COMPANY CONTACT INFORMATION
To ask questions or comment about this Privacy Notice and/or our privacy practices, please contact the Company via
https://askinvestorhelp.force.com/s/
. For users with disabilities that would prefer to speak via phone, you may reach us at 1-800-831-2525 or outside the United States at +1-310-448-6600.  You may also write to:
Investor's Business Daily, LLC
Attention: Privacy
5900 Wilshire Blvd #2950
Los Angeles, CA 90036